If you fell INlife, you’d claim the leading role of the greatest story ever told. The question is really, what do you want to be successful at? They say that no one understands the creative mind – well I do. I’ve been there …. (I am there) so I can relate.
“I’m a little tired right now.”
Here are the results (n.b. wordpress.com doesn’t allow javascript so I couldn’t embed the graphs and have had to make do with screen shots instead).
At the Gates is being released on the first of December and so until then fans can read the first and second chapters over at Bastard's & Lincoln Crisler’s blogs. Tim also decided to mix things up by giving us a look into the mind of a character other than Frank, so he has written and released a small story titled Betrayal which is set in between the events of Resurrection & At the Gates featuring the angel Scarlett.
Heat olive oil, saute onion till fragrant or translucent.
Worried about your child being upset about this invasion of privacy? Rest assured, according to Trease Petersen, youth intervention specialist with the Davis Police Department, says not to worry:
Who is this who comes in love? Who rides the heavens in creative grace, yet is joined with earthly reality and conceived in human life?
Anwaar: I am prepared to die, but let my death be not in vain.
He has taught at the IDF colleges since the late 1970s and for a long time was the only professor talking to officers about military ethics. When the IDF decided to try writing a Code of Ethics, he was approached and appointed head of a team of generals that wrote a draft and then the final version of the 1994 code, which was approved by chief of staff Ehud Barak and prime minister Yitzhak Rabin.
This is what fell out of my car as I moved the seat back yesterday. A grilled cheese. A partially eaten grilled cheese that I was certain my child had eaten. In addition to the grilled cheese, I found a sippy cup of spoiled milk, M&Ms that had been there for so long that they were no longer colored, partially eaten chicken nuggets, french fries, and pretty much every other disgusting thing on earth.
I needed to do this.
Traumatic Circle, 2012, Hayley Jessup
Leave oil on the side, with your cooking ingredients. You will need it in a moment.
Scores of cities across the United States took part in the May Day protests.
I have been in some very odd situations also, and a few that made me concerned for my safety. Driving into a refinery while it was on fire was not the smartest thing we ever did, but we didn’t stay long. A trip in a blizzard on the Pennsylvania Turnpike is the stuff of legend. A meeting in the back room of a South Philly restaurant with “representatives” of five families from the city will make the hair prick on the back of your neck. And waking up to find a stranger standing over your bed (maybe this is one place the word “looming” fits) will cause many sleepless nights. But, perhaps the scariest to me was one time in Louisiana, actually in the same town the motel-room intrusion took place the prior year.
To just be still for awhile. To just hang out for awhile. To just chill, relax for awhile. To just observe for awhile. To just inhale and exhale smoothly for awhile. To catch the pace of people crossing the street and walking the pavements, to estimate the mph of vehicles on the road for awhile. To see the locals and visitors do their thing for awhile. To feel the temperature that's slowly but surely chilling my skin for awhile. And to eat for awhile - of course.
but one thing I am SO very proud of
In the meantime, ponder why you have chosen the conservative or liberal end of the spectrum. Does this exist in harmony with your religious beliefs?
by Susanna Reich (Author) and Amy Bates (Illustrator)
Like most kids that grew up in the 70's, I was mad about The Wombles, and I think their "making good use of the things that we find, things that the everyday folk leave behind" ethos may have stayed with me throughout my adult life too, well at least as a crafter anyway. I was mooching around at work a few days ago ( I work in a large DIY store, btw) when I can across a pile of boxes that the Dulux tester pots come into store in, anyway, they were all in good condition, so I grabbed a carry bag full and went home with a big smile on my face. Been having a little play this afternoon, and this is the first creation.....
On the contrary.
It's day five & I'm feeling a bit stressed out, although not from my challenge. So I did this page to work out my frustration.
Everyone would be happier
this black and viscous sea,
September 25 – AT&T Center, San Antonio, TX
Ruby Red was positively magnetic in how it pulled me in with it's colorful characters, fun and enticing plot, and lovable writing style. I'm so delighted that this was translated into English or I'd have seriously been missing out.
24. Ulysses-Ulysses (Self-Released)
So excited. They were a powerhouse team.
The A is for Adjust. Learn from your mistakes and apply constructive criticism to become better.
The moment his hands touched her shoulders, Amber felt different. She stared into his eyes and her thoughts fell into better order, enough that she could recall things clearly again.
Joan has such fun challenges and her on-line store is really
Stephanopoulos: good point
Assemble the Cake:
I’m insanely happy with the device as it really turns those old classics into fun again. Playing them with other controllers (Gravis, etc.) just isn’t the same. Completely worth the money if you want to relive those memories.
Hughes, K.A., F.H. Rodd, & D.N. Reznick. (2005). Genetic and environmental effects on secondary sex traits in guppies (Poecilia reticulata). Journal of Evolutionary Biology, 18, 35-45.
Well, I was conceived in India, where my father had gone after the First World War, and where my brother was born. It wasn't a very healthy place; my mother was quite ill several times. My brother was five, and I was on the way, so I was sent home, inside my mother. I was then born, but my father stayed in India, so I hardly saw him.
She turns and runs and hears barking, like if a donkey barked, and she hears skittering and she hears the sound of a big splash like a long tail thrashing into the toilet bowl.
To be in the draw you must:
ND - How Jim can I tell you now what an application looks like. I can’t. I’m not going to speculate. We have to deal with any application on its merits.
Renewal of a role-play to scratch a different itch
Ken has to choose between his own life and the life of the man he has trained and brought into the world of contract killings. With Ken respectively declining, Ken’s disloyalty angers Harry and he gets on the first flight to Bruges. With his tendency towards violence, rampant swearing, murder, and quick talking comical motifs gives a deceivingly slow plotline an injection of pace.
The size of the Le Pen vote was painful and surprising. We are looking for explanations. The political class comes up with its portable sociology: the France of people from below, of lost folks of the countryside, of workers, the under-educated, those frightened by globalization, by the decline in purchasing power, the de-structuring of the territories, the presence at their doors of foreign foreigners, seek to retreat into nationalism and xenophobia.
Oh well this is things I collect and tuck away like another ironstone platter, soon as I seen it I knew it was mine
11 believe
My heart settles to serene.
11 Stormkeeper
2. Leave a comment on this blog post by the end of Sunday, 4/8/12. If you could create your own country, anywhere in the world, what would you name it, and where would it be?
He said to them, “These are my words that I spoke to you while I was still with you, that everything written about me in the law of Moses and in the prophets and psalms must be fulfilled.”
Your judgment at once, and my passion you wrong:
When Mimi Jr. first told me how much she loved this recipe, I have to admit, I was a little skeptical, especially since the recipe called for rolled oats. When I think scones, I think light and delicate, and in my mind, oatmeal just doesn't fit into that equation. Since Mimi Jr. loved these so much, I decided to try them for myself. And I'm glad I did. They turned out with the perfect balance of delicate flaky layers and toasty oat flavor, with a texture just hearty enough to satisfy, without being dense or heavy.
Never raise a hand to hit
Then red part lights up and make car sounds.
Below is the IP address of a regular visitor to joejolly’s Internet connection. Joejolly decided, after the IP address became a regular visitor, to see who this regular visitor is and perhaps what is its mission?
Sentiment "It's a Boy" I embossed with gold powder and heat it
Though I am focusing here on how to effectively keep an interesting conversation going.
Date of Decision: 15/03/2011
in a new body which was rarely recognised even by his closest friends
This is clearly the sort of transparency that - while it may short-term inconvenience some western governments - could help the secular trend toward an open world that (in turn) fosters and strengthens enlightenment nations and people. In other words, embrace this! The answer to most modern problems may boil down, time and again, to a more aware citizenry.
Not only monsters but super heroes! It's about time somebody recognized the innate goodness and useful abilities monsters have (except for the good folks at Pixar who made Monsters Inc.)! If The Boyfriend and I were to ever get matching stockings, I would have to insist on some of these. :)
b. Moses Num 20:8 “Take the staff. Assemble the community, you and your brother Aaron. Speak to that rock that’s right in front of them and it will give water. You will bring water out of the rock for them; congregation and cattle will both drink.” Num 20:9 Moses took the staff away from GOD’s presence, as commanded. Num 20:10 He and Aaron rounded up the whole congregation in front of the rock. Moses spoke: “Listen, rebels! Do we have to bring water out of this rock for you?” Num 20:11 With that Moses raised his arm and slammed his staff against the rock–once, twice. Water poured out. Congregation and cattle drank. Num 20:12 GOD said to Moses and Aaron, “Because you didn’t trust me, didn’t treat me with holy reverence in front of the People of Israel, you two aren’t going to lead this company into the land that I am giving them.”
Fresh basil, finely chopped
First, before I begin, is there anything I could say that would increase my fine? No? Okay, then:
Each boat will carry an HD camera and 14 microphones. America’s Cup officials have developed a system called LiveLine that will insert graphics into live shots from helicopters. Lines similar to the yellow first-down line used in football broadcasts will be used to show which boat is ahead, distance to the marks and course boundaries.
A field of diamonds beckon, waving to and fro
Samson manages to be a likable narrator despite being a drug dealer and owning a pawn shop where he pays desperate people practically nothing for their most valuable items.
One of the things that you are learning is how your energy fields affect your star brothers and sisters — and, by the way, us. But what you are also learning this day is how, as you ascend, as you shift, as you become more aware, more enlightened, that we are able, also, to speak more clearly, more directly, to your entire being. Because what I am saying is going throughout every molecule within your body, and with my blue flame of truth, it is clearing out the debris that has prevented you from moving in this way — and assisting you. Assisting — that is our job: serving the Mother/Father/One, and assisting you, our brothers and sisters. So, I speak this way.
#4 Blazing Saddles
“It’s a pretty high level,” Meade said. “There’s no easy games.
guys. tomorrow I'll be sending you a picture of my new compainion and tell
This is how it is staying---wonky on purpose! ((And somehow I get the giggles over how nuts this makes some of you --- let it go, people! You are too uptight! LOL!))
The god of Dan, glorious in battle,
There are no clear leaders in New York because this is the very essence of a democratic exercise. Every day, protesters meet in quorums to openly discuss issues relating to the protest and larger concerns. Every one involved has a voice and is included in the discussions. We’ve seen how easily our “leaders” are corrupted, just look at the President who currently bears little resemblance to the man who was elected. Recently, he’s been talking tougher but it’s pretty obviously a reelection campaign strategy. He doesn’t really want these policies to pass, and he’s counting on GOP obstruction to frame next year’s election. And once he wins, it’ll be right back to four more years of G.W. Bush-extended. We all see it, and we all now know that’s how it’ll be. It’s no wonder that confusion about the motivations of the protesters rein, we haven’t seen legitimate democratic activities like these in a long time in this country.
Today’s Japanese youth get more of the Americanized tattoos that can be easily hidden, but some very wealthy and very dedicated get an Irezumi. It can take up to $50,000 and 30 years according to one source, to get a full body done. Many tattoo artists have traveled to Japan to learn the art of Irezumi for example Thomas Lockhart, legend in the tattoo world, has gotten tattooed himself by famous Irezumi artists.
the ground beneath
When we returned home, the first thing I did when we walked in the door was turn my oven to 375 degrees and pop the dish in to bake. (No real need to preheat and waste extra energy.) It baked about 15-20 minutes and when the whole thing was warmed through, the cheese was melted, and the bread crumbs were brown it was done!
Nude platform heels with diamonds – £24.99 in New Look
It was all the little touches that made my fall completely in love with it, like when you switch from dipped to raised headlights, normally there’s a micro second (and we’re talking probably less than tenth of a second) where you have no light at all between switches, but with the MX5, that didn’t happen, there were separate lights for raised use, so they just came on.
Mix veggies together, scoot them to one side of the pan, and sprinkle some thyme on top. After squeezing as much water as you can from the tofu with a paper towel, hold the block in your hand and crumble it into the pan. Sprinkle the turmeric on top of the tofu. It should look something like this:
It’s now possible to get my novel Barefoot on Baker Street just about anywhere in the world with free shipping thanks to the Book Depository.
I have no bust of Pallas
And I've met some wonderful booksellers who have organised excellent visits because they know their patch, they know their books and they know their schools. Booksellers like Elaine and Sue at SilverDell Books in Kirkham, who gave me a Rolls Royce (or Range Rover) of a day in and around Lancaster and even found time to show me their wonderful bookshop and let me sample their homemade ice-cream. Me, books and ice cream? It could get messy...
Denyse Schmidt is the latest fabric designer I've been needing a fix of. She designs such lovely prints inspired by heirloom prints and gives them a modern spin. They're perfect for just about every sewing project under the sun. What a better way to feed my addiction than to host a Denyse Schmidt Charm Swap.
Frank walks the streets with all of his brothers, explaining how it was with Bumpy. He tells them that "Bumpy was rich, but he wasn't white man rich. You see? He wasn't wealthy. He didn't own his own company. he thought he did, but he didn't. He just managed it. The white man owned it, so they owned him. Nobody owns me though. I own my own company and my company sells a product that's better than the competition at a price that's lower than the competition." He introduces his brothers to his operation, showing them the apartment where his drugs are cut and packaged. The brothers are surprised that all the girls Franks has preparing his drugs are naked. Frank explains that it keeps them from stealing anything. He then has a talk with them at his favorite restaurant. He says "The most important thing in business is honesty, integrity, hard work, family, never forgetting where we came from. See, you are what you are in this world, that’s either one of two things: Either you're somebody ... or you’re nobody." He then excuses himself seeing Tango on the street. He asks Tango for money, from some drugs Tango got from him. Frank sets down a jar, recalling their previous conversation and demands twenty percent. Tango tells him "Get the fuck outta here." but Frank puts a gun to Tango's forehead. Tango, knowing there's a crowd around and it's daylight, asks "What you gonna do? You gonna shoot me in front of everybody?" Frank however, does exactly that, leaving twenty percent in a jar by Tango's head, and then walks calmly back to the restaurant.
Note: The limits for contributions to SIMPLE plans and IRAs did not increase from their $11,500 and $5,000 amounts respectively. Nor did their respective catch-up limits of $2,500 and $1,000 increase.
The Chinese Pool and KLCC Water Park
A tree whose hungry mouth is pressed
We've been every year for quite a few years, with baby in papoose one time!
Records — Yorktown 7-4; Mahopac 1-6.
A wee bit frizzy because my hair wasn't totally dry when I took the bun out, but, not bad, right? Related: my hair is really short when it's curled. Yikes.
3. ALLEN IVERSON
And BOY do those flaws become obvious. It's actually amazing how obvious they are! Things we found "cute" and "clever" in our query all of a sudden revealed themselves for what they were: two-ton anchors weighing the thing down. And that's when we realized something.
of rules and new
she seemed excited yet hesitant.
The Bath Bubble and Beyond Aloe Vera Soap has been handmade with the finest ingredients, the Aloe Vera and Glycerine ensure your skin stays gently moisturised all day with no irritation.
This herbal tea is available on my website in 2 sizes. Either a 6 pack of single serve bags --OR-- a 2 pack of Large tea pot bags. The tea can be brewed in a basket coffeemaker too if you don't have a tea pot!
10. I once spoke a damn decent amount of Spanish, and have managed to forget most of it, which is pretty unforgiveable really.
Make a promise to me now,
I'm not sure they pack the graphic, modern punch I'm looking for to balance the traditional pieces in the room. Daniela posted this amazing $500 Horchow Knot mirror replica that would certainly do the trick! (For $80, whaaaa??!!)
How the GOP Ruined This Kind of Person for Everyone: They… actually haven’t. So, uh… good job, GOP.
Fortunately I brought along a new book, a 485 page complex detective novel (from the Preston & Child Pendergast series) which I finished just as we were called back into the courtroom yesterday. Shows you how much time we had waiting (or how fast I read).
What is bad? Not much, actually. Data turns traitor yet again, or at least appears to when seduced by the Borg Queen. His ‘betrayal’ is this unnecessarily long, drawn out process in which he even fires near misses at Cochran’s ship to prove. That seems like an enormously risky just to create false drama. I also think Worf’s involvement is awfully contrived, but not as badly as it will be in Insurrection. Yes, the Defiant was built to fight the Borg, but does it not seem strange that DS9’s big dogs would not take the ship into the fray rather than Worf and some second stringers? It has to be that way for the sake of the movie, but still…illogical. As is the idea the Vulcans never detect the Enterprise because of the moon’s gravitational pull. Yes, the moon moves the oceans and hides starships.
Holiday Baggage (Not for Children) ... LMN ... 10 PM
I am a wasp chewing an old fence post,
When modern authors tackle the popular fairy tale Little Red Riding Hood, they generally feature a strong heroine, who may kill the wolf herself, or otherwise outsmart it. This makes us feel like we've progressed so far from the Victorian simpering victim idea of the female protagonist, but actually this empowering ending is actually only hearkening back to the original Grimm story, which includes an addendum that is usually forgotten. (By "original Grimm story," I don't mean that the Grimms collected the first version of the tale, simply that this was how the tale appeared in their collection.)
Thanks everyone for your lovely comments on my previous cards. It's always a pleasure to read them !!
The B side of this tape, entitled “Nothing Personal” is the shadowy walk home from the beach. You are drenched, lost and alone. It’s nightfall and you can’t remember where you are headed anymore. The bluesy, distorted guitar leads you as you simply walk among the trees which seem to morph quite Alice in Wonderland-style before you. But as the track comes to a close, single distorted notes seem to present beams of light from the other end of the forest that, once again, beckon you home.
Over the past few months, I’ve met many business owners and property owners and managers who have had a negative experience with their energy supplier. It is widely known that companies located in de-regulated energy states are more often than not better off purchasing their supply of electricity and natural gas from a supplier other than the local utility.
So what to do...cut a carrot instead! But don't you just love it?
5. Für Dich
It’s a MAD, MAD, MAD, MAD World if you follow the broadband industry. Barriers are falling, borders are reshaping, allegiances are changing.
Tripoli, Libya — When things got desperate in Libya last year, Aisha* thought of leaving and risking return to her native Iraq with her four children. But as other refugees from Iraq and elsewhere crossed into Tunisia, red tape and rigid officials prevented her from following: here.
Even after I outgrew the touching young tales of princesses, I still can't stop myself from watching movies like "13 Going on 30" and "The Proposal" (which, might I add, are two of my favorites). It blows my mind how I can become jealous of a young girl who falls in love with her best friend after magic dust takes her forward in time, or a woman who blackmails her co-worker into becoming her husband. Do things really happen like this in life? If so, why haven't they happened to me?!
It was a beautiful ceremony. Erin looked stunning in her mother's wedding dress. I love my brother and his wife so much, I am so glad I could be a part of their special day.
On Tammy’s blog is an interesting post by Maynard. It dovetails nicely with Dymphna’s piece from last night about the decline of the mainline American Protestant churches as evidenced in the their emergent anti-Semitism.
THE PRESIDENT: I’m sorry –
Oil the grill by dipping a wad of paper towels in oil and brushing across the grate using long tongs to prevent burns.
I received a TOP TEN Award from TWO different bloggie friends! What a terrific way to start the week!
2) Submit Paper on multiple logics and VWs
.thank you to Kawaii Fair Designers for the hard work & creativity!.
And that, as they say, is the good news.
And after thirty long days without my sweet girl, my youngest, my fighter and the epitome of my greatest fears realized, I can say only that I miss her.
Michigan
What does all this have to do with catchphrases and slogans? Well I believe that slogans are where poetry and business meet to make creative, suited up word babies. Let’s use a classic: “It’s everywhere you want to be.” (Visa). I can’t be the only one who imagines days and weeks and months of endless whimsical travel at the mere mention of the word “everywhere.” And Visa not only encourages us to “be” everywhere, it promises to be there with us like a dependable travel companion. Magic, in six words. Before you pack your bags and impulsively hop on a plane, let’s look at some of the other slogans that may or may not have been influenced by common poetic techniques:
Anyone who consistently works with words can understand when I say that writing is often a pleasurable torment. There is nothing more delightful than experiencing that pleasurable high when the day’s writing has gone well. Of course, the flipside means equal measures of frustrating torment when the words won’t come together and all that work gets axed by the delete button. But having good days and bad is nothing new, nothing to stress about, unless you’re on a tight deadline.
KEYDATES:
The next day I decided on a toasted cinnamon and raisin bagel, again I used the cutter and lightly toasted my bagel. Just perfect with butter and a cup of coffee.
I started this year with no outside commitments for myself. My only job in life right now is to be a supportive and loving wife to Matt and to raise, love, enjoy, teach, and care for our children. (**My only...as if it were a small task- Ha) Oh yes and let's not forget taking care of the home.
He was!
--It seemed as if I had to think through the dance more than I do in close, although that could just be because I'm not as accustomed to this kind of connection.
Chick-a-dee-dee-dee (Side step)
Which one, he asked us, was authentic — i.e. of the period — and which was a reproduction?
As I was looking through my file of blog ideas for what to write for today, I came across this post on Disney Princesses. It’s pretty long, but it uses the princesses to describe the dating scene for women. The first lesson – Don’t be a Doormat for Guys is the one that inspired this post. The author uses Snow White as the example for that lesson.
I felt like I was in a new episode of The Twilight Zone. I wouldn’t have been surprised if Rod Serling, creator of the science fiction series, was in the next room monitoring my breathing on a large screened computer.
What are you passionate about collecting at the moment?
An orthopedist finally found the fracture and put a cast on my leg just to help the healing even though I had been walking around without it for 3 weeks.
How do you feel about corals? Yay or nay?
hugs Sarah x
2010.08.23 Pakistan Kurram 8 10 Islamist bombers take out seven tribal elders and a teacher at a school.
I would love to tame a crow. I have tried, but they want no part of it. They used to get into my garbage when I lived out in the country. Oh, I could hear them squawking to their relatives, “Hey, Ralph, the stupid lady put her garbage out.” Sure , we had two cans, but most weeks we had an extra bag or two. I soon found out that the crows could see a white bag and were on it before I could say, “Shoo, crow!” But, then I smartened up too. At the time I was a stay-at-home mom, so on garbage mornings, I would start throwing crumbs of old bread out into the yard for the birds, particularly the crows. I knew they would come quickly.
We know how messy the little ones can get. I was given the opportunity to review the Angelina Ballerina Apron from Buy Cute Aprons which helps solve the problem. It is suited for children between the ages of 2-5 years old.
every now and then you redescover stuff that you kick yourself for forgetting.. for example that it makes sence to shop your perfectly oversized t-shirts at men's department.. so greetings from topman.
I wonder, too, whether the Friends of each library will have any say in how 'their' money is spent? Will they have the power to allocate their own funding to suit the individual needs of their own library? In this public, open forum, I'd like to ask someone from NCC to give Paula and me some truthful answers to all these questions. But I won't be holding my breath and twiddling my thumbs while I wait. I'll be nagging Andrea Leadsom, my local MP (again) to get properly engaged with our fight to save this essential community resource for future generations. It should be just as big and important a button on her website as Wind Farms or High Speed Rail.
9. Caravan
Eighties synthesizer music always sounds overly dated to me... to the point where I often can't even listen to it. However, Mr. Orr was a man of talent. It takes a lot for me to get past the Casio, but Benny manages to pull me in.
Czechoslovakian sheep’s milk
My package pal is a young woman that lives on the beautiful island of Victoria in British Columbia. She is a math wiz and teaches school.
when the morning light sings
As a result, President BO (the child president)'s revelation that he was "introduced" to dog meat is abhorrent to many Americans.
I invite you, to check out this link if you need to go to the throne, and make it right with God.
As Cebu’s business continue to grow and continue to compete globally, Cebu businessmen need to accept that outsourcing Internet Data Center requirements is a more viable option in fulfilling this objective so that they can focus on their core business, Reynaldo R. Huergas, IP-Converge president told.
I curse. Abby has never heard me curse before.
Try something you've never tried before!
X is definitely not for the squeamish but it is much more that the mere gorefest that an initial glance would suggest.
November 2011 352 pp Hardback 978 1 84980 014 3
Every one a revengeful burst
Before you begin reading: What do you think the disciples did with the “12 baskets left over” when Jesus fed the 5,000? …
1/2 cup of yogurt
hmmm....
﻿ Above is another of my aunt with an unknown woman in 1971, at the potluck Christmas party that they enjoyed on the shop floor. I cannot determine what the other woman is holding up near her head because this photo is not very clear. This was the year that Jinx played Santa adorning herself with full costume because no one else would do it. Jinx never weighed more than 100 pounds and was about five foot six inches in height, she was strong, muscle and bones. That makes it all the more humorous that she would be Santa, but she did. Again, doing what no one else would do, not learning more but just doing this for some fun. So here is "Skinny" which was one of her nicknames all her life, as Santa.﻿ She certainly worked hard at a nontraditional place for women, but she could enjoy herself too.
Does self-employment appeal to you?
An appeal hearing would have brought the matter back to the public’s attention, and especially if Mr Sheridan represented himself, then the case would probably have lasted some days. The High Court might well have passed adverse comment upon his conduct of the trial. That is not intended as a slight to him, but instead simply a reflection that, when in the dock in the High Court, it is usually advisable to have a Queen’s Counsel of great experience representing you.
What the hell did he know? My father had drank like a fish and he’d lived to the ripe old age of forty eight. I had plenty of years left in me, I reckoned, and anyway, all doctors are Nazis.
"It hasn't been issued to me," he said after being asked about it at a press conference at St. Lucy's. "You're delivering news to me."
Finally I had a wonderful dinner at one of my favorite restaurants Furin in Delray. A perfect way to top a perfect day!
I was commissioned to create 3 images. This one was my third. I started with some concept sketches and then created the large spacecraft and the 3 smaller troop carriers in Google Sketchup. I rendered them up and took them into photoshop where I added the colours, texture and background.
for greatness and furnished me unto good works. Therefore, I ask that you open
The wing is formed of three main elements, the main plane being very short with much longer chord flaps behind it. As is common for most teams now, the flap adjusts cross about 75% of the span. The outer 25% section being at a fixed angle of attack, as it forms part of the endplate. Along the intersection between fixed and adjustable sections of flap, Sauber fit the pod for adjusting the front flap angle (FFA), used during pitstops.
Today I was FB chatting with my lil bro. I randomly was like do you know what your name means. He said no and I looked it up and told him it mean “Jehovah increases” He didn’t know what that mean and I told him Jehovah was another name for God. He was like O okay. Then I asked him if he knew who the guy was that he was named after in the Bible. And he said no. I wasn’t having that. I told him that he should look it up and that I knew there was a Bible in that house somewhere. I then told him how I’d like to meet king David one day cause he was a pretty awesome dude and Moses. He then proceeded to say that the smaller people always get left out and that nobody cares about them as much. (I wasn’t sure if that was a reflection upon himself or people he doesn’t even know in the Bible) I told Him well I cared for him so that makes him cool. He’s like ditto. I then told him well there’s people like Job and Nehemiah who aren’t talked about much but they’re pretty important. Told him how Nehemiah practically rebuilt all of Jerusalem. He was like wow. I also asked him if he knew what this was, the this was a picture of the wailing wall, he said that he’d seen it before but didn’t know what it was. I then told him about the temple and told him how people came a destroyed it which is why there’s only one wall of God’s old house left. He’s response was those people were evil. I then told him but do you know what the temple is now after Jesus came. He’s like no and I quoted for Him 1 Corinthians 3:16-17. He’s like ooooooh okay cool. Asked him if he knew how that was and he said no and I told him about the Holy Spirit and how He helps us and baptism and told him that way no matter what you’ll know you’ll never be alone cause you’ve got the Holy Spirit living in you with your soul. He took more interest in that.
"I'm looking for that feeling of Ahhhh......I guess it can be defined as a good balance between the leader and I. I have danced with him before, I recognize his gentleness, his caring and he wants the same thing I do: to dance a good tango, not involving to much effort but creating a great connection, sharing some wonderful energy, and matching our intention, good vibrations and level of dance."
For Lindy running the cannabis farm is only the beginning of her problems. In fact her cousin wants her deal in cocaine. He has cunningly chosen her because she is a vulnerable lonely girl from a dysfunctional family with no-one to look out for her well –being. Lindy teams up with another neglected boy who because of his own problems hasn’t spoken for two years. Karl is a mute but he is attracted to Lindy and together they make a desperate bid to save her from prison and the crooks.
Have you ever had a bill due and didn’t have the money to pay it? When
Gold: Pig Iron Porter, Iron Hill Brewery & Restaurant, Wilmington, DE
Since coming out to myself about a year ago I’ve toyed with the idea of changing my name. And I don’t just mean taking the shortened version of my given name, but going for an all-out Name Change. As much as I would love to cling onto the person that I was and just keep the name Steph, or Stef, I’ve been increasingly feeling like there’s no way I can be entirely comfortable with either of these names. I felt weird enough switching to “Stef”, because that was never who I was, and is not who I am, exactly. It seems more and more lately that I need to find a name that I like and want to adopt for myself. Which I’ve found, at least a first name, so that’s always a start.
The possibility of implanted bombs has been a concern for US officials since at least 2009, when two incidents occurred involving militants who had spent time with leading figures of Yemen-based Al Qaeda in the Arabian Peninsula (AQAP).
God's plans seldom make sense. They often appear crazy, to us and especially to others.
Considering the northern california bankruptcy of the northern california floods to increase their insurance plans also travel with participants across the northern california festivals an increasing emphasis placed on early learning. Parents in California Schools has formulated a task force that also branches into other areas of student help. California Schools has formulated a task force that also branches into other areas of student help. California Schools receive educational childcare, enroll more students, find transportation and improve test scores.
I've never had pomegranate molasses, so I decided to research how to make it. It's very easy to make yourself, and I show you how here. You can buy it, though I've never spotted it where I shop.
"She;s not who she was," said Mrs. Thwett. "I'm afraid if they do pull down house it may be the end."
But anyways, I have signed up to do the Brentwood Craft and Gift Fair again this Christmas, after a years break, so am back to crocheting. Yay! I should hopefully be back a bit more often now.
remove the dough and cut it in 4 equal sections. cover the pieces you are not working with and keep them apart from each other or they will fuse together again. best to keep them on a lightly floured plate or plates.
Uh...thanks, Freddie, but I don't know..."You will come to Seoul soon?" No.
In his latest interview two days ago, he lets out much info either openly or in Intel code. He mentions “all of the sudden there are many Drakes out there” and “There is only one of me.” This indicates that they have clones of him ready to go out and put forth disinfo.
This book was different to what I thought it would be but I still highly enjoyed it.
Everyone has a Beastie Boys story, don't they? No? It's never good when anyone only 47 dies of cancer, but I have to say that the band left a very light impression on me. Except for the time I rode in the same El car as a number of Beastie Boys fans. It was a fairly crowded car, but they stood out. How do I know they were Beastie Boys fans? They weren't shy about it.
Original description Motarebel Herijuana: Herijuana is “oldschool” pot that’s been grown in Humboldt county for over 20 years. The parentage is “Killer New Haven Strain” x Petrolia Headstash. A proven medical strain that will cripple the average stoner. There are 3 phenos to be had, all of them are excellent. The flavors will also vary depending on pheno. The mother i used was a very dense budded female with a sweet hash flavor. A very bushy plant that would benefit from being topped. Jack 33 is a phenotype of CH9 Jack X CH9 Flower .
If you want to find more of Lucky’s work check her out at the Hillside Music Festival, Ottawa`s art in the Park, Toronto Outdoor art exhibition, Shelter Valley folk festival and at the Lakefield Farmers Market on Thursdays (July and August).
Can we plan Him into our days?
When you pick Shaklee, you will know three things to be true. It is always safe. It always works. And it is always green. Win win and win right?!
Flaked hot smoked salmon-as much or as little as you like
Despite the Israeli policy of "transfer" – another term for ethnic cleansing – the Palestinians will not go away. The Israeli state can occupy our lands, demolish our homes, drill tunnels under the old city of Jerusalem – but we will not disappear. Instead, we now aspire to a directly elected leadership for Palestinians in Israel; one that would truly represent our interests. We seek only the legal rights guaranteed to us by international conventions and laws.
This annual award recognises a special volunteer who embodies the welcoming and supportive 'spirit of SCBWI' and has made an outstanding contribution towards growing and shaping SCBWI British Isles. What we'll say here is that Candy is one of those rare individuals - a guiding light in the murk of creative confusion. She'll inspire your beginnings, sythe through the mess in the middle and clear a path to reveal the end. Hers was no dreamy drift into publication but a bumpy road just like everybody else. It's a continuing journey she shares in order to inspire and inform.
Curry leaves are mostly consumed in south Asia and you can see that effect of it,many people will have long lenghty hairs. Yes, its good for hair.
please feel free to give some feed back on the items
with a dot.
5. Sit back and wait for us to tell you they have been uploaded. If we don’t reply within a couple of days, please let us know, as we sometimes miss one or two pictures.
We had a Christmas Eve celebration with my family on the day before Christmas Eve because that worked out best for everyone. The evening was later than usual so we didn’t get everything done that we usually like to. However, it was great just spending time with each other.
ME: Hi. I’d like to schedule a check-up on Monday for my two cats.
Just a heads up - stay tuned for the Quietfire Design blog hop coming next week. Don't miss out on winning something. BIG GRIN - don't say I didn't warn you - and the hop starts at my blog I think.
Everything is linked to everything else, but this is a flavour of how to address the barriers and obstacles I faced doing this work across many areas over several years. The best advice I can give to any professional, regardless of which organisation they work for, is try to put history out of your mind and design things afresh; look at everything from the opposite point of view
“Your condition is the wet, or exudative, form of MD. This is the most severe form. The blood vessels have grown from the choroid behind your retina and it is becoming detached. In many cases, it can be treated with laser coagulation and with medication that stops and sometimes reverses the growth of blood vessels.”
7:00pm CST
Another reason you have unreasonable gasoline and utility prices. Baby, you ain’t seen nothing yet. They are just getting warmed up. They will slow down to get Obama re-elected then the mass crucifixion will begin. CB
The People article goes on to point out that Reynolds realised the damage this exposure would do to the party, and offered to stand down.
It was one of the first news/media reports in the world to do so.
I always love when a client enjoys color as much as I do. To date this is one of my favorite style plans and I can’t wait till the after photos pop up in my in box.
Not “get old” as in I’m tired of using them. Frankly I don’t use them so much that they get old that way. But they do apparently get old after time, and less resilient – I’m here to testify.
In the house, up to date magazines were neatly fanned out on a coffee table, next to a large ash tray with a matching cigarette lighter and a cut glass candy dish. New issues of Popular Science and the other how-to magazines were stacked next to my dad's reading-smoking chair.
I smiled and thought that was the end of it, but he continued to look at me as if I was supposed to continue the conversation. So I said, "yeah, I probably could have used the exercise, too, but then again, I have been biking a few times this week, so I should be ok."
Now, I was thinking of wholly new book covers for my Pazuzu Trilogy, so I didn’t plan to fiddle with the old pieces of artwork. Still, I felt compelled and the compulsion wasn’t selfish. Encouraged by the number of people looking at the first book in my Pazuzu Trilogy, I wanted to recognize those visitors and offer everyone a little better Pazuzu – the Artwork that is. I continue poking at the 8th revision of the story itself and that’s still coming. In the meantime, I think readers will be just as satisfied with the current 7th revision.
Turmeric Powder – Pinch
Nutrition isn’t something we get by food alone. We are nurtured through our relationships, spirituality, exercise and career; what the Institute for Integrative Nutrition calls Primary Food.
And finally, to not be a total hypocrite, I'll add a picture!
It was also the Fashion and Sewing show too and they had the Downton Abbey costumes…I am a big fan so thought I’d show you a piccy!
that does twine the Souls mend
“I am concerned for the security of our great nation; not so much because of any threat from without, but because of the insidious forces working from within.” – General Douglas MacArthur
Tell us a bit about your writing history and your journey to publication. Is The Benefactor the first novel you wrote, or do you have others tucked away in a drawer somewhere?
As I talked with the Springfield Police Department dispatcher, I headed in the direction the shooter had gone, dashing down an alleyway and slipping between the circled wagons the library and museums provided. Doing the same was a workman at the Quadrangle. My sister, in her school teacher voice, cautioned him, "Sir, please be careful." It made sense.
“I was at the side walk of the road, texting to a friend who had gone missing when about 10 police officers charged at me. I was wearing the yellow Bersih T-shirt.
“I’m not hungry.” Po says. He smiles and tosses the dumpling back to Shifu.
I LOVE this book. It is so thorough and no matter how weird your dream is, it can unravel it for you. You can see a clip about her book HERE.
The shells with striking beauty lie
There are the “workers”. The gentlemen who had something better to do on the previous evenings (possibly in a box at the football?) and have Sunday afternoon up their sleeves to have a few cold beers (and check you out!).
255Soft as the slumbers of a saint forgiv'n,
And now the other horses are taking fright.
“You thought…how cool is this…how great is that…but you should have listened to the fear. Stupid stupid woman.”
Lieber said he didn’t know the answer to the question.
In conclusion, your lily white status doesn’t make you the paradigm of ethical values. You know why? Because in a few chapters on, when that hot guy suddenly decides that he loves you for some inexplicable reason, sex will be all you’ll be thinking about. All that moral posturing will fly out of the window and you’ll be a reckless, impulsive horndog just like the
Ooops, I'm getting a little long today - maybe this should be a 2 parter or more! :)
Jesus does not promise his disciples a comfortable life, free from trouble. He does not promise them good health, a fat bank account and a mega-church in Texas. He promises them that if they are really his friends, and if they are bearing witness to his words, and if they are really keeping his commandment to love one another, the world will hate them.
COOLING TIME: 30 MINUTES
Sometimes, life will inevitably force you into the shadows, you shouldn’t allow the shadows to consume you and prevent you from truly enjoying the dance of life.Who gets rob here of a life that you could have?Now not without sorrow and lost.But,a full life of saying,”I GAVE IT MY ALL WITHOUT REGRET”.We surely need to keep reminding ourselves, that we just have to “keep on dancing”, no matter how hard Life gets,never give up,we are all “children” at heart, and need a reminder we can do anything.
punishable by death. I was once told a legend on the lethal protocol
Suzan Buckner I know this sounds crazy, but I get creative watching reruns of the Gilmore Girls. It is like it puts my mind at ease, and their constant bantering makes my mind work. Weird, huh?
So enjoy them while you can.
He passed the recipe on to his son, Frank “Cheech” Argiro who owned the Country Club Bakery until 1997. Cheech was good friends with my husband’s grandmother, so we were able to hear from her all of the details of the famous pepperoni roll invention. Others have claimed to be the first, but don’t believe them. Frank Argiro was King Pepperoni Roll.
Now heat oil in a pan and add chopped ginger-garlic ..Saute for 1 minute in low flame.Add dry chilly pieces and saute.
A Town Without Christmas ... INSP ... 3 PM
stillquiet in the silent burning arias of the vents:
Meditation scares many people because of the idea “we have to be silent in our thoughts” for meditation to work. After several weeks, months, etc sure that’s true. But like working out and dieting, it takes time and effort to get there.
Everybody knows you've been discreet
I have been pulling the ones with the flowers and using them for green onions. The ones below are in my herb box. I planted one onion that my friend gave me a couple of years ago and it just keeps multiplying away. I have only been cutting and using the tops. I guess I should dig them up and see what I've got! LOL!!
With no one to defend him
To enter this giveaway-
Keyshawn Martin
When you are ready to cook, preheat the oven to 176C and line a baking tray with parchment paper.
42. I like to ease into things.
And don't be making plans that involve getting dressed at the week-end. Although I have a selection of outfits that might fit the occasion.
but Chopper flips out and objects, holding a test tube in his hand (with some sort of test results).
(*Anne's final thoughts:
how to do that.
Hey guys
3 tbsp ground sunflower seeds
Nick Hoffman mysteries by Lev Raphael – This time I would actually suggest that you start with the second book in the series, The Edith Wharton Murders. Nick Hoffman is a professor in Michigan.
The pink Ladies
I know I have written before about the windows just off the kitchen that faced south. There were tables there right up next to the windows. There were four windows. That is where Grandma kept her African Violets, geraniums and some ferns and a philodendron that grew up the wall and went over the ceiling. When the room was painted the philodendron roots had to be dug from the plaster.
Last summer my family and I were traveling in the Lower 48 visiting our supporting churches and relatives. Somewhere around Iowa, I think, we stopped at Wal-Mart. I needed some yarn for a shawl I planned to knit for my great-grandmother, so my older sister and I headed back to that department to find some. Mom was in another area of the store picking up some other items and we planned to meet up halfway. As we entered the yarn aisle, I vaguely noticed walking past some guy and thinking, Good grief, what's a man doing in the yarn aisle? Ugh, what a wimp! I thought nothing more of the guy as I began happily studying the wonderful selection of yarn. But just a few seconds later we heard a voice. The man was talking to us. I noticed he seemed mentally slow so my initial response was politeness (I do not believe in belittling people who are handicapped). He appeared to be a harmless handicapped man, I thought. My sister and I pretty much ignored him, and I was intent on finding the perfect color for Gammie's shawl. But the man continued to talk. I just brushed it off. However, after a few seconds I got that feeling. Discomfort. Suspicion. Fear. He started asking random personal questions. "What's your name?" And he persisted though we continued to ignore him. Finally the signals and red lights went up and we realized, We've got to get out of here! So I grabbed three skeins of yarn and we were off, with the creep calling after us. Adrenaline was pumping. We were practically running. We weaved through aisles, trying to lose that guy in case he was stalking us. What relief we felt when we saw Mom. Oh! We're safe. We told her all about it. Funny thing is, after it was all over I was more upset about not being able to examine all the choices of yarn than anything. (Aughhhh, Naomi! =D)
CASA stands for "Court Appointed Special Advocate", an adult who acts as an advocate for children who are, for whatever reason, caught up in the court system and have no adult to act on their behalf.
the actual wedding, I feel the a bit of pressure in making
“XCOR continues to solidify its reputation as an innovative, nimble company when it comes to research and development practices,” commented XCOR Chief Operating Officer, Andrew Nelson. “This test would have cost us over $500 per minute had we operated it on a traditional pump test stand. The entire trip represented about half a million dollars in net savings in both time and money for the company. More importantly, it validated that our critical pump subassemblies will have the ultra-long life needed to meet the safety needs of our customers and a vehicle that is designed to fly thousands of times over many years. Oh, and everyone had a lot of fun along the way!”
It is Cat on a Hot Tin Roof that I feel is among the two films that stand out in my mind as Taylor standbys. I assert it not only showed off the woman’s acting bravada but highlighted her sex appeal to the max, ironically in the role of a woman unable to turn her husband on. Besides that supremely tight fitting skirt she wears at the film’s start, it is the image of Taylor removing and replacing her ice cream-soiled stockings that always sticks with me, perhaps because that garment is rarely featured prominently.
Me- I throw a punch...hit
Serve with anything!! It will taste Divine.
Where is the taunting? The insulting emails? The late night phone calls of laughter and derision?
fertility to the Earth; I ask that you likewise
This week I feel the need to express some thoughts about recent press regarding scandals in the yoga community, in particular, regarding John Friend. The details of the scandals are not important to me, but the general reaction to them in the press more so. We are all flawed and beautiful as we walk this Earth together.
SEO and SEM can benefit small and medium-sized businesses (SMEs) in competing with larger well-known brands. Internet users may have been conditioned over time to expect that the most relevant sources to their search query is listed at the top (Dou et al 2010). The number of click-through rates based on the search result position supports this theory (see Figure 8) with the top three positions likely to receive the most click-throughs.
Mornings are white like a canvas before me
Martha Stewart Butterfly Punch
Reason for Choosing: The name of a new friend I met on the Internet the other day.
She confides in Kathryn, who tells her that if she cares about Emmett, she has to say something, no matter the cost. Bay goes to talk to Cameron, who promises that Olivia is done selling drugs. He offers to ask her to move out, declaring that he is determined not to let Melody win. Bay hones in on his word choice, admonishing him that this is about Emmett, and while she may lose him over this, it’s certainly not about Cameron “winning.”
That’s where you can let things out of your unconscious that you might have not realized.
I left for South Korea on March 17th (St. Patrick’s Day back home) and stayed there until the 20th. Even though it was only 4 days, I think I still was able to see a lot.
More often than not a Gentleman needs only a hint of a tan to take the edge off a pale complexion so when in doubt build your tan gradually.
legally binding,
the foe’s haughty host in dread silence reposes,
During all of the hype of last week one of our trainees received the worst news. He received a message to say a family member had died. Whilst most of us would have crumble at such news our trainee said being with CREATE was the best thing for him. He soldiered on through our important visit and engaged professionally and calmly with our visitors…no-one would have ever known that 30 minutes prior he was privately being consoled by our team. Four years ago this trainee found himself in a downward spiral when he lost another very close family member and ended up homeless and reliant on alcohol. This time he approaches this from a much calmer place and we’re pleased to say he’s coping much better.
Summary of the past year: Polyface farm internship. Starting in October 2010 we became Polyface contractors, running a 300-acre rental farm. We've got lots of animals right now- 400 head of cattle, 1600 egg-layers, broilers both in the field and in the brooder, turkeys in the brooder, our personal rabbits, and our personal (very small) dairy herd (no one is in milk right now). We love it here.
Since I won't be attending The International Quilt Market this spring in Salt Lake City, my younger daughter, Katie and I visited Moda in Dallas, Texas. What a wonderful trip we had! I thought you might enjoy seeing some of the Moda facilities and where all of the "Magic" happens. It really is impressive! It was a very quick trip but we really enjoyed it.
Today I am talking to Carl Gardner, a former government lawyer in Tony Blair’s administration and author of the Head of Legal blog, about the legality of the War in Iraq.
Bee hummingbird
Perceptual states, on Hume's view, are not “copies” of external reality (this has been shown to be absurd by extension of the absurdity of the concept of “external reality” itself). Rather they are states of the body: the (physical) process of perception has caused a (physical) change to the body (the “impression”). Crucially the impression is not identical to the experience. The formation of the impression is one physical part of the larger physical event of experience. There can be no metaphysical distinction between the mind and the body for Hume, who denies the possibility of any metaphysical distinctions whatsoever (exactly as Berkeley does). When we talk about our “impressions” we are talking about states of our own bodies; this need not involve us in the concept of representation. This is why Hume says that we cannot even assume a numerical correspondence between impressions and “actual objects”: impressions, understood as the physical effects of physical causes, cannot be assumed to perform a representational function in the first place.
Israel and Americans who support it must wait for the November 2012 elections before the threat the Obama administration represents can be removed.
there. I’ll be making the version in the lower left, using the contrast
If this is all you ever know about Neva and her father then I can understand why you might not like them. But if you read on, you’ll find characters struggling with guilt and misinformation. By the end of the book, I hope you’ll be cheering for both characters.
Briana’s face lit up in a smile. “You are? Congratulations!” Her eyes strayed to the wagon and her smile faded a little. “But, no… I don’t suppose he would respond very favorably to that. I’m sorry, Kira.”
U + R
#149 fireflies when I run when the sun is setting
Rodman later entered rehab for treatment for drug abuse, and appeared on Celebrity Rehab.
There are some of us for whom New York has always been home. And there are also those of us for whom New York is is not home. And there are those of us who have more than one home. Or who think of themselves as having no home. Home is complicated.
He noted that while these pathogens can be found in the mouths of wild Komodo dragons, they disappear from the mouths of captive animals, due to a cleaner diet and the use of antibiotics.This was verified by taking mucous samples from the external gum surface of the upper jaw of two freshly captured individuals.
He identified the snake as a Copperhead, and rushed me to the nearest hospital's Emergency Room.
Enlarge that picture of those flosses above.
Suppose you installed the biggest, strongest, most secure lock in the world on your front door, but you put the key under the front door mat. It wouldn’t really matter how strong the lock is, would it? The critical factor would be the poor way the key was protected, because if a burglar could find it, he’d have everything he needed to open the lock. Encrypted data works the same way—no matter how strong the crypto algorithm is, the data is only as safe as the key that can decrypt it.
I feel very low in strength and ambition, and the ground has not been prepared as it should have been. And May should invite. It’s not meant to be yet another month for huddling by the fire with one’s knitting. But this is it, date-wise, and I must at least plant the cheerful, delicious indestructibles who love the Strathardle challenge, peas and broad beans and potatoes.
He didn’t. In fact, it’s quite the opposite: he’s actually put out seven really good albums over the last five years alone. And yet it feels like he’s disappeared right out there in the open. You would think with so many people lamenting the alleged Death of Hip-Hop that a legend like KRS-One would get recognized for dropping a few instant classics over the last several years.
The party gained more than 200 seats four years ago, but is expected to make losses after what it called a “tough couple of months” when the electorate suddenly seemed to wake up to the fact that the country was being run by a bunch of bungling dim-witted clowns.
Thorn had more work than she could handle and that was the way she liked it. The shop was open
So what are you waiting for? Parents who have small children should start investing in real estate. Real estate investing may sound very difficult but if you’re equipped with the right knowledge and tools, you can be successful too. Study about real estate investing now and prepare the needed capital.
together in the bared fields of the Lord.
and the erratic flights of crows,
It is time for another challenge over at Sparkles Monthly and this time the theme is "Men Only" now this does not mean that only Men can enter! What we want to see is all your creations for Men.
Time for you to go and experiment with your PVA glue and your foils now. Have fun.......
The Northern Lights is one of the major attractions for tourists visiting Norway in the winter, and people travel from all over the world to catch a glimpse of the famous phenomenon.
every night –
— Deny favored treatment to advertisers and special interests and resist their pressure to influence news coverage.
I leave for Florida on Thursday morning, but Kris is going to keep working him throughout the week. Hurrah for consistency! I think he's finally starting to understand that he has a job, and the consistency is paying off (albeit it has only been 4 days of riding, but the seeing him/grooming him/grazing him every day is definitely having an effect on his attitude). Until then, I'll continue riding him.
Holocaust Remembrance Day (Yom HaShoah) began in the evening of Wednesday, 18 April 2012, and ended in the evening of Thursday, 19 April 2012.
but then, there was a smaller group. the group that hates children. or hates mothers. or hates mothers with their children. or something like that. they would shoot me glances, like, "can't you get that kid to shut up??" trust me lady, if i could, do you think i would be walking around the store with a screaming toddler? there was one lady in particular. we got in line behind her, because it was the shortest line which usually means the fastest way out. as i pulled my cart and screaming child up behind her, she gave me this look that made me feel like the most insignificant person on the planet. and then she shook her head. and looked at me again, with an expression of disgust, a little anger maybe, some contempt. whatever it was, it was ugly.
A great trilogy! I look forward to reading more adventures in Fool's Gold!
Tibi- which is well known brand. loved by amongst others Elin Kling,
The affair was not to bring happiness; not to mention the repercussions for Dickens’ wife and children. There were rumours of Ellen bearing children who went on to die in infancy, and efforts to conceal the affair caused the writer and actress a great deal of distress which perhaps, in addition to his unstinting workload, contributed to the stroke that eventually killed him at fifty-eight.
Oh, I can't end there. Here's something my wife pointed out:
I will warn you now, once in this shop, it is hard to get me out.
“They talk about principles, about fighting for democracy but this does not seem to be a practice in the party,” he said.
On March 3, 1836, only 183 men remained to defend The Alamo against a huge army led by Santa Anna. Two hours before dusk, the Mexican guns suddenly stopped firing. The end was near.
Before I left for my trip down south last week, I utilized my leftover mojo marinated steak and sofrito to make this Puerto Rican inspired hash for breakfast. Now, I am not sure that there is any sort of traditional Puerto Rican dish like this, but the flavors gave me inspiration and I thought it was a delicious way to “use it up” and you guys know I am all about using it up. The bright flavors of the sofrito up front mixed with the highly spiced steak and the earthiness of the potatoes coated with the egg yolk sauce rounds it all out. Pour a little pique sauce on and your taste buds will be in over drive. Pure deliciousness.
Throughout his Presidency, FDR received thousands of letters from the general public. Americans shared their reactions to Roosevelt’s speeches and policies, requested action on political issues, expressed support or voiced concern over the President’s approach to the New Deal and to the war effort. Some even requested financial or material support for themselves and their families.
As the dude from Cheers says in Spice World: “HAVEN’T THEY SUFFERED ENOUGH???”
Hera is a queen of the people. A deity of the earth, and all that entails. Her eyes may rise above to perch among the heavens, to watch the mortal realm beneath, but her thighs are coated often in the dust from the earth below, where she walks in silence, down every road, down every path to hell beneath. To watch the living. To watch the dead.
PÁDRAIG Ó SUILLEABHÁIN
Question: In the same period, what country was France’s largest arms export market in Europe (third
We only know the small part of God that has revealed himself to us. But He knows us in full. He knows us more than we know Him. He knows us more than we know our selves. When we are at a loss for words, when we are speechless, when we are hurt and raw, when we are happy beyond words, he knows. No explanation necessary. No long story to get your point across. No awkward silences.
I know what you're thinking: a real wild man, this guy. *eyeroll*
“Pink wave turns to tsunami, Bollore yacht in difficulty,” said one.
After calling it a day on that small engine, Dayyibu, Abdu and I worked on trying to get a Mitsuba 125cc motorcycle to run. It hadn’t run in a while and doesn’t have a battery. Every motorcycle around here has a kick start in addition to an electric start. We put some gas in the gas tank which Bob thought might have a leak, and Dayyibu tried to start it. It wouldn’t start. He got tired of kick starting it, which is very slow so we tried to run with it. Abdu and I pushed while Dayyibu rode it down a slightly downward sloping section of the grass. I sprayed fuel down the throat of the carburetor and it attempted to start but wasn’t really getting going. Abdu and Dayyibu tried a few more times to get it started going up and down the slope. I told them they were wasting their time and energy doing so but I didn’t mind waiting around for them to get tired out. They eventually gave up and wanted to take a look at the spark plug. We don’t have a spark plug socket, or even a regular deep socket for the size spark plug on the engine so we couldn’t remove it. Most spark plugs are either 13/16 in. or 5/8 in. but this one was 11/16 in. I wasn’t positive the carburetor was getting any fuel to begin with so I disconnected the fuel line to it. Nothing came out. I disconnected the fuel filter and gas started to pour. The fuel filter was clogged. Dayyibu blew through it in both directions to clear it up, I put it back on, and it started up. Voila. We called it a day.
So those brothers-in-law dwell hard by as neighbours in Hawkdale, and are great friends. Thorkel. and Gisli built a fine house at Hol, so that it was soon no less a homestead than Sæbol: their lands touched and their friendship seemed likely to last. Thorgrim had the priesthood, and he was a great stay to those brothers. Now they fare in spring-time to the leet, forty men of them together and they were all in holiday clothes. There too, was Vestein, Gisli’s brother-in-law, and every man of the Soursops following. Gest, the son of Oddleif, the wisest man in Iceland, had also come to that leet, and he turned into the booth of Thorkel the Wealthy of Alvidra. The Hawkdalemen sit at drink, while the rest of the freemen were at the court, for it was a Thing for trying suits. All at once there came into the Hawkdale booth a great oaf, Arnor by name, who spoke and said: “You Hawkdalemen are strange fellows, who take heed for naught but drink, and never go near the court where your followers have suits to settle. This is what all think, though I alone utter it.”
It can be tapped into by interviewing those who have the fire so that it can spread. It can bring love for art, even art sales. Most of all the fire can bring delight – the kind of delight seen in the book of Genesis when God looked at the world he had made and declared that it was good.
Tomorrow is a great opportunity to practice some budget philanthropy by taking a guest to a museum. Not only do museums rock (and are sometimes expensive!) but by going you can learn one new thing about history and culture that might expand your horizons. Knowledge gives us the opportunity and desire to show more compassion and tolerance for our fellow roomies on this planet we call our home.
Iván Meade - How do you help your budget conscious clients achieve an expensive look without breaking the bank?
12. Are you a neat freak or free spirit? definitely a free spirit!
Net sales. When royalties are based on a percentage of net sales, the parties must decide and stipulate what the term means. Often it is gross sales less discounts, commissions, returns, taxes or other credits as intended by the parties to the agreement. This definition is obviously very important as it is used in calculating royalties to be paid.
That’s right boys and girls. I’m just going to come out and say it. If you’re resorting to forcing yourself to write, you’re probably in for a rough existence.
Reed College at that time offered perhaps the best calligraphy instruction in the country. Throughout the campus every poster, every label on every drawer, was beautifully hand calligraphed. Because I had dropped out and didn’t have to take the normal classes, I decided to take a calligraphy class to learn how to do this. I learned about serif and san serif typefaces, about varying the amount of space between different letter combinations, about what makes great typography great. It was beautiful, historical, artistically subtle in a way that science can’t capture, and I found it fascinating.
May all beings be at ease!
What is he doing now you ask (as does anyone who asks about Devin)? Absolutely nothing. Stays out all night with his friends, sleeps all day, doesn't work, doesn't help around the house (unless it is to occasionally mow the yard). Walks around like he owns the joint or runs the place (whichever way you want to look at it).
Jim Coleman told the N&O that the State Bar will be concerned about "not only whether she is misrepresenting and abusing the judicial process, but also whether she is filing patently false allegations in pleadings and taking advantage of the immunity that she has (as a prosecutor). ... She really is undermining the integrity of her office." Coleman also predicted that Cline could face a contempt-of-court hearing from Hardin.
I only hope next year is full of more bubble tea, more cuddles, more laughs, and overcoming obstacles. No real big resolutions - except to not lose my temper with my dad since I'll be around him a lot more with no classes. Wish me luck?
My favorite spot to stand backstage is behind the double doors that lead upstairs in the Longbourn home. Peeking through the small sliver of space between those doors, I see faces; completely engaged, usually laughing, entirely wrapped up in the electric chemistry we’re creating on stage around the beautiful story we’re telling.
Well sometimes the best stops are the ones that catch you by surprise. When you live in an area tainted with coffee houses every 30 feet for miles, you can be a bit jaded and a bit less impressed by what has become just another me too scenario. Like every pile of rocks has the potential for gems, so does the coffee Mecca of the Seattle area, one of these gems is the Richmond Beach Coffee Co. We have come to loathe the idea of another sterile coffee and internet genera yuppie hangout, so when we stopped to get a cup of wake me up we were not expecting much to say the least, but a treat was in store for us.
Yield: 2 dozen
My first of two projects was revealed this week as part of my guest designer assignment for Pages From the Heart! The assignment was to create a banner of any kind and I had the American Made line by My Mind's Eye. I really liked this paper because it has a vintage feel making it look even more patriotic in my opinion. So without further ado...my banner!
Place your smaller rectangle on top of your base piece, you will see it will fit edge to edge. Pin it in place and sew where your top stitching is around both sides and the bottom, leaving the top open (remember it is a pocket...and yes I have made that mistake before LOL). I just aligned the pocket piece on top of the base piece using my eye, but you could measure to be sure it is exactly level with the bottom of your base. Also before you sew make sure to try it on your dresser to be sure the pocket is as high or low as you want it.
120) an anonymous "blessing transfer" into my bank account that came right on time...
Who says we have to condition AFTER we wash right?
I used the Cherish Punch Around the Page set by Martha Stewart. Flowers from Magnolia and Wild Orchid Crafts. Bling from Prima, pearls made with Pearl Maker Amber. The vintage image and lined paper from the Memories paper.
And the awe passes wonder then,
What I do remember is him grabbing my pants, zipping them off and tugging them down in seconds. A lonely blue thong remained. It was a new one, one he'd never seen before. A small thread of decency. One that was removed in something like half a second. I think spanking parties should have panty removing contests. Which top can de-panty his girl first? I do think College Guy would win every time. I'm never prepared for how fast it goes when he's about to discipline. And I usually end up yelping in sheer surprise.
Rhetorical Analysis: Their really werent many decisions I could chose to or not to do because the scannable resume was preety much standard. Per the isntruction about creating a scannable resume, I added the keywork section under my name and address so that an employer could find it using one of the keywords listed. One thing that I did make sure was in the document was proper spacing between each plac of location as well as each educational institution I attended. I chose to implement spacing so that all the information in the document would not run into each other and that the infomration was still clear to read. I aligned all of the text to the right of the document because you are not supposed to have any formatting effects in a scannable resume. Unlike the traditional resume, I decided to make the font all one size in the scannable resume. Since it is a condensed format, this will be easy for the reader to read and focus on.
My eyes pop open
Armed with my Plan, I head to the register when I suddenly remembered the second item I needed to purchase. I made a quick side-step over to the makeup, grabbed my favorite eyeliner that I was nearly out of, and scored a place in the checkout line. As I stood surveying the candy and lip balm, I looked down at my hands and horror washed over me when I realized what I was holding.
other right-wing expansions of government
In the whole big
Nathaniel Waterman, Thomas Fenner, Henry Ashton, John Morey, Daniel
Just one, only one full, deep tissue massage is really all I want. One time to relieve all that residual soreness, and all that huge stress that comes from a complicated life. One time to know what it is like to feel the releif wash over you and to feel that physically relaxed emotion. Beyond that I would take what I could get the rest of my life. However, just that one time I would like that experience.
There was screaming, and pointing of fingers left & right. NO NO NO, that word is NOT fair!!! I have a PENIS, how the *hell* am I supposed to know who wrote the fucking "Princess Diaries"!! (Incidentally, it was this woman.)
What is this volume button for?
Nose: Pipe tobacco, camphor, aged leather, eucalyptus, sizzling butter, pink grapefruit, ripe apricots and peaches, roasted chestnuts, popcorn, a little minerally.
Monday started off as any other Monday for me. Wake up, eat some breakfast, shower, and head to work. The only problem is that my car apparently wanted the day off. Trudged back inside, called son the mechanic to make arrangements for car problem, then called taxi to ferry my ass to work that day. Relatively cheap repair as the shop where my son works gives healthy discounts to family members. Car tow, new starter, and new oil pan gasket replaced for less than $260.00. (Apparently small oil leak from oil pan shorted out starter.)
I sat on a curriculum planning team and got to see firsthand that the sequence and scaffolding of the concepts were well thought-out. The age-appropriate lessons for 4th grade were extensions and expansions of the lessons for 3rd grade. The lessons for 3rd grade were extensions and expansions of the lessons for 2nd grade and so on up and down the line. I once had a discussion with Clay Shirky about Math curriculum and he unequivocally told me that the current progression is about as good as he can imagine.
It had become a glimmering girl
Who felt God calling her to work for Him but was mortified at the thought of following Him to the hard places? This sister.
The piccie here is of a "Crazy Cake", cut up and decked with fruit ready for the supper at St Phils. It's a strange recipe, that I couldn't resist trying out. I don't even remember how I found it, but the recipe comes from a vegetarian site. Maybe one of my facebook friends mentioned it, or something. It has no egg and no dairy, and was apparently a depression era invention.
Sometimes I’ll be writing for so long that I start missing things. Plenty of times I’ve come across missed words or even half a sentence that suddenly stops short. I think I’ve written it but I haven’t. Oddly enough, I still remember what words are missing and stare at the page as if someone has stolen them, thinking `I’m sure I wrote that sentence. Where is it?’
Why do I have such fond memories of a home so apparently horrifying?
HP unveiled a plan for new, low-energy server technology and launched a hyperscale business unit committed to data center efficiencies.
A moment, not missed, nor lost throughout strife.
All go today, need to let Zac loose in the kitchen again as he gets ever so upset if he can't help me make lunch and then I need to find a way to get some Christmas cards made without these two destroying them as I go - wish me luck!
According to the Advocate General, the principle of exhaustion applies where the right holder, who allowed that copy to be downloaded from the internet to a data carrier, also granted, for consideration, a right to use that copy for an unlimited period of time. Noting that the marketing of computer software most commonly takes the form of user licences, he considers that an excessively restrictive interpretation of the term "sale", within the meaning of the aforementioned directive, would divest the exhaustion principle of all scope and undermine its effectiveness. He also proposes to define the term "sale" as any act by which a copy of a computer program is made available in the EU, in any form and by any means, for the purposes of being used for an unlimited period and in return for a lump-sum payment. He is therefore of the opinion that a "licence" for the use of software should be considered as a sale where the customer thereby permanently secures the right to use the copy of the computer program in return for a lump sum payment.
California is top of mind for consumers when one thinks of wine produced in the United States. California’s winemakers have taken reign to even trademark Napa Valley, comparatively to the Champagne region in France. One ingredient, fermented grape juice has entirely transformed the beverage industry and until recently many winemakers have created new blends and profuse accessories too attract the common man and woman. When pairing food and wine, many believed that wine went with finer cuisine, typically French, and beer went with… well, hot dogs.
Order today to get the first menu and start cooking!
Other public bike art featured in this article, has been removed, such as the mural by Mandy Bouriscot which graced the lobby of the now-demolished, old Mount Pleasant Community Centre. Maybe the mural will resurface somewhere else one day.
And the author graciously agreed to do an interview with me! C.J. Hill happens to be a friend of mine (and in a not so well guarded secret, is actually a pen name of a well known YA author). Do you know how she really is?
Cream cardstock ( for the base)
The omnipotent is the golden light under the rock Vedas (root lotus, earth element).
I've had this dress for three years, and I just now feel like I've figured out how to wear it- or maybe I'm just more comfortable with things being simpler now. Either way, I definitely have a tendency to over think things. I've been making the conscious effort to simplify lately, an uncomplicated outfit is what I always end up feeling best in, and I feel as though I have to constantly remind myself of that. There's that inner voice that insists "LAYER!" "ADD MORE SHIT!", but inevitably I don't end up feeling good in those outfits. I can't decide if this tendency for "more" is a side-effect from blogging- of constantly seeing other outfits that might be deemed "better" and/or more interesting- or just another iteration of my natural tendency to hoard and drape and collect.
Ever since I started wearing makeup, I’ve always loved wearing blush. I can skip eye makeup, I can skip concealor (not cuz I have nothing to conceal), I can even skip foundation. But I love blush, and all the different colours are enough to make me go crazy. Gransenbon is one brand of blusher that I love for all the different colours, and wish dearly that I could own them all.
All submissions become the property of Harper Ganesvoort.
I don’t know where you are going,
My first reaction on the inside was disappointment, not for myself but for Nevaeh. She had talked of little else since school started...she wanted to be able to conquer her fear and go across the monkey bars. And now...here she was, holding this little girl's feet...a child I love and is a dear friend of Nevaeh's...able to do this very simple thing that my child so wanted to do. My heart was silently screaming..."HOLDING HER FEET! WHILE SHE IS DOING WHAT YOU SHOULD BE DOING, YOU WERE HOLDING HER FEET? WHY, THAT IS LIKE....." and as I groped for the words...the Holy Spirit whispered to me..."Like Jesus washing His disciples feet?"
1/2 cup (2 ounces) freshly grated Parmesan cheese
Communication involves using tools to “push” information to people and/or “pull” people in by the information we share...With the Web, we are able to combine the “push” and “pull” of communication to achieve a dynamic experience for listeners and viewers...Our intent in communicating the gospel is to determine how the message we communicate should be focused for the people of our time...we are concerned with the question, “How can the gospel be communicated to make the message heard and seen, and then either rejected or accepted?”...The Christian gospel is a matter of decision … All that we who communicate the gospel can do is to make possible a genuine decision.”...But our objective should always be to present the gospel in ways so clear and self-evident that the recipient will have an Aha! experience and the good news will make perfect sense to his or her inner world...Because communication, and more specifically communication of the gospel, is a matter of participation, we who communicate the gospel must understand the others to whom we are communicating. We must find a common ground upon which to communicate...When we communicate the gospel, we seek to make vital connections that:
Adullamite's a displaced Scot, whose blog ranges over a plethora of interesting things and thoughts, though I don't share his enthusiasm for football, Scottish or otherwise. All that effort wasted on kicking an effigy of an inflated pig's bladder up and down a muddy field. Once upon a time, of course, his ancestors would have been kicking an enemy's head around the town. I suppose a adidas pig's bladder is easier on the toes.
The Explanation: I have my classes arranged in pods of 4. I passed out one problem to each pod. I told the groups that for the next 10 minutes, each group was going to become an expert on this problem and that during these 10 minutes, I am going to do everything in my power to help them become experts – I’m going to check their answers, ask them questions, show them the next steps if they get stuck – do whatever is necessary for them to become experts. This is important because after those 10 minutes, I’m going to give them the sheet of paper that has all the questions on it and they have to answer all of them before the end of the period. But, this shouldn’t be too bad, because there are 4 experts for every question around the room – so if you get stuck, just find an expert. It is important to me that every person in the group understand and that every person be able to explain their problem – this is important because if someone asks you how to do it, you better be able to explain it. This is also important because if you ask me how to do it, I’m gonna shrug my shoulders and tell you to ask the expert.
CORCORAN-- Officials at the California Substance Abuse Treatment Facility and State Prison in Corcoran (CSATF/SP) are investigating an inmate death as a homicide.
When a seventeen-year-old Moldovan boy is found dead on Hampstead Heath, the case falls to DCI Karen Shields and her overstretched Homicide & Serious Crime team. Karen knows she needs a result. What she doesn’t know is that her new case is tied inextricably to a much larger web of gang warfare and organised crime which infiltrates almost every aspect of London society, from the back streets and high rises of Tottenham to the multi-million pound hideaways of the new international entrepreneurs.
expressive and creative portraits; and producing beautiful fine art photography around our world.
Flora and Fauna in Zanskar
And, it shows!
The political Left in Norway are supporters of a strong and all-encompassing political regime, namely their own. They support the idea of outlawing political views that go against their ideology, including criminalising criticism of Islam, multiculturalism, feminism and alternative lifestyles such as homosexuality. They embrace the use of awareness campaigns that promote their own political agenda and mock those of their opponents. They embrace the idea of state financial support for the national media, which in an ideal society should be completely independent and shouldn’t have any ties whatsoever to the authorities. They also wholeheartedly support any measures that increase their stranglehold on society, and which they use to the fullest.
I couldn’t see this from below, but at the ridge, the ground drops abruptly beneath our feet, a sheer and deep cliff. One more step and I would sail over the edge to Wadi Bani Kharus below. This cliff seems to spread infinitely to either side of us. Moo wants me to walk to the edge so he can take a photo, but I’m too terrified to get close. No mistakes can be made here, and as klutzy as I am, I can just see myself tripping over my own feet and falling to my death below.
Tonight I shall be checking out the Eglo Records night at Fabric with: Floating Points (Live); the Eglo Live Band with Fatima, Olivier Day Soul and Shuanise on vocals; label boss and Rinse FM DJ, Alexander Nutt; Funkineven; Arp 101 (whom I’ve only just discovered is Alix Perez); and Slum Village DJ, Andres. Then on Friday there’s the Darkhouse Fam EP launch with Earnest Endeavours at a Secret Warehouse location in Hoxton with Galsamp Killer and Kutmah also on the bill. Hopefully be able to tell you more about both of them afterwards.
Mile 1: More people jockeying for position that there are at the Amarillo Wal-Mart on Black Friday. But the people at Wal-Mart are more sweaty.
The problem with this is that by the time I finish uploading all the pictures, I don't feel like doing anything else--namely writing an actual entry. Oh well. I'll try.
SCC: “Death is the end of the road – the ultimate destination where you can be alone.” Caro, Rob and Jamie all have a parent who has committed suicide, and this has, whether knowingly or unknowingly affected each of their lives. Was it important to you to show the repercussions that a parent’s actions can have down the generations?
14. Here’s the deal, give me a kiss and if I don’t like it, I swear I’ll give you a full refund. +
Indeed, Miss Sery is the precisely the kind of open-air artist we would love to see in Africa. Not far from where I live is a stupendous gorge above the Congo River called “Cassandra’s Crack”. It was named after the wife of Sir Arthur “Podgy” Podgkin, the Victorian explorer who tragically perished in the rapids below. If Alizee were to perform near the edge of The Crack, flinging her garments into the yawning fissure, it would certainly be celebrated as a pious deed of remembrance. The exotic dancer is revered in our part of the world.
Another likely attendee is Jason Koornick who operates www.philipkdickfans.com. When we needed a PKD website Jason stepped in and delivered. He has been operating PKDfans.com for ten years now and is up on all the Hollywood doings and everything to do with Philip K. Dick in this new millenium. Jason's knowledge will be a great asset for all who attend the Festival and have the opportunity to talk to him.
Yes, tooth, singular. Evidently, I was only granted one tooth's worth of wisdom in life.
My little ones perish in all the earth!…WHOLE GENERATIONS SLAUGHTERED!…
This next is possibly the best of all:
RR—Pinpoint lights and firefly lights—they seem to issue from a very intense center. I’ve been back out there with multiple witnesses where these lights have appeared in the treetops. Sometimes they’ll blink on and stay for awhile, sometimes they won’t. I even have some video of that. Of course, it’s really hard to see. You really can’t prove anything with it, except that everybody that was there can testify to the fact that they all saw it.
The above is attributed to Francis Hamit of BrassCannonBooks.net, understanding how it should be.
I booked it down interstate 80 towards Kearney. I wish I had a picture to show you what this looked like, but this was far too white-knuckle driving to document. Imagine driving into what appears to be an apocalypse, with black as soot clouds overhead, every vehicle on the interstate going half speed with their flashers on through buckets and buckets of rain, before finally exiting the rain and trying to keep your car driving straight through the inflow winds, which were ripping in from the southeast. I even hit a tumbleweed, if you can believe that. Definitely not time to try to snap off a photo!
As Bonfire Night is coming up, let's add some sparkle to our cards. So anything glittery, shiny or sparkly goes here.
The purpose for the cleanser is to bring something back to its original state or as close to it as possible.
I know they don't like spoiled babies at daycare, but I can't help but hold him almost all day. If he naps I will sometimes put him down but usually I just hold him then too. I am just trying to get the most out of my time here at home with him because I know we'll never get these days back. One day he may think he's too big for his momma to hold him, so I soak up every second of it I can now :)
Durham, NC ?
I'm experimenting with some ways to "spice up" the early bird work in my classroom.
NewsCorp sees growth potential and I think they are right. We ruled out Chinese TV for now, but who knows how fast the Chinese speaking community grows. In a couple of years it might be not so bad idea to start casting multi-language speaking Chinese actors/actresses.
We've got two tracks here that almost form a bit of a musical suite. "Blood Queen of Sun Ra" shuffles along the rings of Saturn, and includes some groovy samples from god knows where. "SOL's Time and Space" drifts along a more conventional, but well played Floydian strut. There's some vibraphone, or xylophone, or somethingmaphone that brands the track with a nice, unique musical identity.
She hesitated, expecting Van Raighan's Wilder ally to be waiting in ambush, but no attack came. Might the Wilder have a reason to wait, get her isolated? If it was powerful enough to stretch a Gateway across eight miles of the First Realm, her Gate would pose it no obstacle at all. On the other hand, if she went through first and got hit, she might lose the Gate, stranding her with the Wilder, and Dagdan and Notia five miles from a town that might still be under attack from the Wildhawk.
My point in all this, is that I am a hard worker. I always have been, and believe I always will be. I work hard for the money I make, and I do not feel guilty for splurging on the occasional pair(s) of shoes, or a new hand bag. That said, money always seems to be an issue. I got in a fight with my boyfriend last night because he insinuated that I take for granted the fact that he pays for most dinners we go to. I asked him to join me for a friend’s birthday wine tasting in Temecula, he immediately became irritated that I had signed him up for something he would “be paying for”. Not once did I say he had to pay for it. In fact, I planned on paying for the both of us because it was my friend’s birthday and I was inviting him. His birthday is the week before, and I have already spent a couple hundred dollars on his gifts. His Christmas gift cost over a grand. So you know what, I feel like I am the one being taken for granted (I didn’t even receive a Christmas gift). Just because I don’t pay for every other dinner or whatever doesn’t mean we are not equals in the relationship. I fear we are falling back into old habits, and the monetary excuse was just a guise for the fact that he doesn’t feel like commiting 5 hours one Saturday to spend time with me and my friends. Moral of the story is that I’m not gonna be broke forever. Should this relationship pan out, and my education goes as planned, it’s very likely that I will be the primary breadwinner. Then what will he have to hold over my head?
Only Man has hands. We use them as a tool, to make tools, and as a weapon, they serve as eyes for the visually impaired, we can 'talk' with them, they have become a symbol of salutation, supplication, and condemnation.
So, how can you beat Tulum? Awesome ruins, great beach views, no human sacrifices and lots of history – I highly recommend it! One tip – it can get pretty hot. I would go early and bring water. Also bring your suit because the beach is open for swimming!
Last weekend was the big Sevens world rugby tournament here in Las Vegas. I don’t know anyone that is a rugby fan and have never seen a game myself. But those DJs I listen to on the New Zealand radio station are big rugby people – always talking about their All Blacks. Seems the Samoa team beat the New Zealand team at the final game, so those guys were probably talking it up yesterday.
If a friend has been battling cancer, it is very special to gift them with a purple heart. When they finish treatment, or go through a tough time, I'll slip one in the mail for them, or on their desk or somehow get that gift to them. It's a talisman that I give them to help them remember, 'You are brave' and hopefully they will never have to be 'brave' in that way again. Sometimes a friend will ask to buy one, and I give it to them for whoever they wanted it for. Sometimes at an art show, someone will be in my booth that needs that purple heart, and it again, is a gift to them. In a small way, that glass can maybe help make at least that moment better.
What if you were unable to access your money and banks were closed?
This is our first year homeschooling. We started out a little slower and later than I expected because of a death in the family. When we did get started we had some tweaking to do on our schedule and when I think we got it... We moved which meant a week (or two) off. Starting back wasn't as easy as I wanted it to be. Thanksgiving gave us another break, although I managed to make it only 2 or 3 days. Then Christmas came and I here we are in the new year still not really started.
Pours transparent copper-orange with a nominal, light ecru head that dissipates quickly and leaves a faint collar. Cascade hops dominate the aroma’s foreground with some caramel to the back. The taste surprisingly balances with sweet malt caramel and biscuity flavors then finishes with a middling hop presence that is citrus and pine that fades quickly leaving a lingering bitterness. The malt is not sticky or overly sweet; it is simply the dominant flavor. Smooth bodied with medium carbonation lend a dry finish.
*a puuurdy center(button, brad, pearls)
After all the food & formula he puts away I thought for SURE he'd hit the 15lb mark.
Kiwis are on sale this week, and they are most welcome, as one of us is down with the flu and two of us have something (mild flu or some other virus), and fruit is the most tolerable food.
2. Place 1 teaspoon crabmeat mixture in center of each wonton wrapper; moisten edges of wrappers with water. Fold wrappers in half, forming triangles; pinch edges to seal. Stand pot stickers on the folded edge; press down to flatten slightly.
11.Carga Viva
I never said my reasoning and/or fears were sound.
Matheson however is on tender hooks, the city might fall if there is a Salmond bounce carried over from the Holyrood election and minor players such as the Greens and Lib Dems get more seats.
Bitter gourd, 1 pc, cut into thin slices
* Blake Nelson Boyd as Mr. Afraid of the Ground Man.
...Simple and casual for a day spent mooching around the sea front. I'm wearing vintage cut offs, a white tee tied up, studded slippers from Topshop, and my favourite gold cross. The coat was from a Camden charity shop ages ago and is my absolute favourite - the purple fur collar was a sale find at ASOS and I sewed it on myself. As promised, here are some snaps of the boyfriend from Brighton as well...
Because darkness and a void of hell existed on the face of the deep prior to God’s creation “in which we find ourselves” created as human beings today, it is clearly evident that the devil and his angels fell prior to the creation of this realm.
But - easily the best part of my afternoon of shopping was the company. You see . . . as I was heading off to shop - I ran into the ever-delightful Patricia Shackelford. And she was totally game to take part in this completely rudder-less adventure.
There is nothing essentially revealing in this story about the Chinese government’s crackdown on dissidents and censorship of the Internet. The history of such recent abuses dates back to Tiananmen Square.
Deep wits
I bought a huge lot of CD's (150 of them suckers) off of the Knock Knock pop punk board a few years ago and it had this in it. Along with 2 other Atom and His Package CD's. This is the second release. It also features a song by Fracture (really good). I have no idea how to put this into a genre. Electro-melodic-pop-punk??
Zone B refers to areas out of which Muslims could meaningfully be driven without being driven out of the UK, but within which they have sufficiently large numbers, geographically concentrated to a sufficient extent, that they are not an atomised presence whose people, homes and businesses can be attacked on an isolated basis. There will be countless towns and cities across the country whose Muslim populations are such that they meet this description, such as Cardiff, Bristol, and Nottingham. These places form Zone B, which exists in a scattered, pinprick fashion across virtually the whole of England, and parts of Scotland and Wales.
June 25th was Take Your Dog to Work Day.
Providing mobile computing solutions does not meаn јust providing the equipment and thе connectivity. Most mobile computing solution providers alѕо conduct seminars іn which thеу train users hоw to handle the equipment. This iѕ highly neсessary аѕ mobile computing is ѕtіll a developing field. There arе also consulting services аnd hotline numbers provided in case of emergencies аnd breakdowns. In short, mobile computing dоеs not entail just equipment; it alѕo extends to service аnd management.
Reviewing the list, one will see industries with rapidly declining or growing LQs. Michigan’s concentration in auto manufacturing declined 15% from 2001 to 2011. On the flip side, Alabama’s concentration in auto manufacturing grew more than 466% in the last decade, indicating that the state is now taking up a much larger share of national employment. Also note that growing employment paired with declining LQ indicates that the industry is not growing as fast in the state as it is in the national economy.
"And he said unto them, Ye are from beneath; I am from above: ye are of this world; I am not of this world." (John 8:23)
Come on...he’s the great Americana Superhero!
The Human Rights Act has, almost certainly, been misused and has thrown up many anomalies – but is this a reason to remove it from our law? `We can repeal the Human Rights Act, but we can’t take ourselves out of the European Convention on Human Rights without coming out of Europe. It may well be useful to have a British Bill of Rights, building on the provisions on the HRA – a Commission may well recommend this in time.
Tana Smith
Anyway, this beer is pretty straightforward. Pours dark with a light-brown head that retains a little bit as you drink it down the glass. Aroma is malty and roasted with no fruit or spice notes. My taste buds picked up sweet malt with a hop balance on the back end. I also detect caramel and roasted coffee flavors with each sip, with the roasted and bitter flavors coming through as it warms. I almost want to say that I taste candy flavoring, like a burnt version of Werther's Original caramel.
Before this weekend, I had never tried sunchokes; before last month, I hadn’t even heard of them. I think they may be an Eastern Canada thing? At any rate, they have no relation to Jerusalem, and they are not artichokes, just giving further indication that names are, generally, completely arbitrary markers. What they actually are is a species of sunflower, whose tuber is what you see above. Its taste is hard to describe, though it does have some passing resemblance to artichoke. One thing I can say is that they taste extraordinary—rich, flavorful, and unique.
I can understand why visits from people like David Beckham or even, love her or hate her, Cheryl Cole, would boost morale. But David Cameron? Give me a break.
forms the first of many
I'd a-hired a band
4) Butter both sides of the bread and toast it on the stove.
Most of the time, it's fun.
*McCoy is still having a hard time getting to sleep. It's hard to deal with all the advice that I've asked for... some of them are differing. But school starts tomorrow so we will be back into a better routine soon enough.
“Jesus knew what they were thinking and asked, “Why are you thinking these things in your hearts? 23Which is easier: to say, ‘Your sins are forgiven,’ or to say, ‘Get up and walk’? 24But that you may know that the Son of Man has authority on earth to forgive sins….” He said to the paralyzed man, “I tell you, get up, take your mat and go home.” 25Immediately he stood up in front of them, took what he had been lying on and went home praising God.
‘No,’ she repeated, turning to me and raising what would be an eyebrow, if she were human.
“Meanwhile Matthew Shardlake is given an intriguing legal case by an old servant of Queen Catherine Parr, which will lead him into the corrupt labyrinth of the King’s Court of Wards. Asked to investigate claims of ‘monstrous wrongs’ committed against his young ward Hugh Curteys by Sir Nicholas Hobbey, a Hampshire landowner, which have already involved one mysterious death, Shardlake and his assistant, Barak, journey to Portsmouth. Shardlake has taken the case, despite the imminent threat of invasion, as it also gives him the opportunity to investigate the mysterious past of Ellen Fettiplace, a young woman incarcerated in the Bedlam whom he has befriended and whose family once lived nearby.
So in the dark he will remain
Thanks so much for stopping by. I always appreciate your kind words and support.
-Rudy Guiliani
Garlic- 8 cloves
I would have been one of the failures. I'm pretty certain I would still fail this test today, even though I consider myself fit. As I have shared before, I could never do a pull-up as a child. And I couldn't run (still can't). I never once passed the physical fitness test (PFT). But I was also on a swim team. I attended daily swim practices (until I quit). Did the fitness test account for that? Nope. I was unfit because I didn't meet their (carefully selected, I'm sure) criteria. Was I obese? Nope. But I would have contributed to the percentage of students who failed this test. I would have been someone they referred to as part of a nationwide health crisis.
As if Christ stood on yonder clouded peak
Cody Nance has a bruised knee but is expected to compete the rest of the weekend.
Tragedy of another kind almost struck just before the shooting of Guest House Paradiso was due to begin. Mayall was involved in a serious quadracycle accident and was in a coma for several days. The film was delayed for four months to allow him to recover, although the way the pair refer to the incident, you’d hardly know it was a near-death experience.
Tarte Dijonnaise
SH: I don't have Asperger's.
The Road
I stood behind him. To the right. He was my imam. I followed his movements. Matching. Just a beat behind. And I knew that into the world of the great unknown he would always precede me. He would always clear the obstacles. My Imam.
these are SO good! and SO fast(for bread sticks) *from food.com
1 knowin'
If you said the words “romantic moated manor house” a building like Birtsmorton Court might well come to mind. A structure that has evolved over seven or eight centuries, this beautiful house is made up of a mixture of timber-framed, stone, and brick wings, all different but wonderfully harmonious, set in quiet countryside, and partly shaded by trees. Birtsmorton may have been begun in 13th century, but in the 15th it was bought by one John Nanfan, who rebuilt most of it. In subsequent centuries, the house was home to various landed families (including relatives of Richard Hakluyt, the writer on exploration, and the family of William Huskisson, the statesman who was the first person to be killed by a railway train) and several of these later occupants made substantial alterations to the building, producing the delightful hotchpotch that remains today.
Khalid Sheik Mohammad, generally regarded as the mastermind of the 2001 attacks, and several other Guantanamo detainees will be brought to the U.S. to face numerous federal charges at the recently built coffeehouse about 80 miles north of Milwaukee.
I did not wake disappointed but happy that somehow I saw the truth. That God's universe is out there and we are just doing our best to piece together what we can understand.
One could reasonably argue that buying nothing would do even more damage, since our economy seems to be increasingly based on services and retail outlets selling those inexpensive, made-anywhere-but-the-USA-because-the-labor-here-costs-too-damn-much products, and the people who work for the stores that sell those goods could be out of work if people don’t buy anything and stores have to close as a result.
"I love life, Minnie."
Nonetheless in terms of ninety minutes (or more?) these are mere statistics which will have no bearing on the result. Perhaps more significant from our point of view is the position of goalkeeper. The FA have rejected our appeal re Doni’s red card and we’ve recalled Peter Gulacsi from his loan spell at Hull City which his just as well neither John Burridge, Neville Southall or Andy Goram could be tempted out of retirement!
Yesterday we went to church. We do almost every Sunday (unless we are sick or traveling). Our church happens to take 3 hours of our Sunday. Jimmy had decided yesterday that he doesn’t want to go to church right now. Because I am all about him getting a choice in his life (especially because he is not a permanent fixture in my life), I let him choose to say home. I will say that I was uncomfortable with it. We are always uncomfortable leaving him alone in our home. We set booby-traps to catch him in case he snoops. I know it is silly, but we need to be vigilant with this kid. Jimmy has a pretty checkered past.
— Charles Kuralt
First and foremost, I always want to give credit where it is due. I saw the idea for my Christmas tree SOMEWHERE blog hopping in the last few days. I wish I could remember where, but unfortunately, blog hopping has became a new disorder that I have to cope with. So if it is YOU reading this, please let me know so I can give you proper credit. :)
Building on their 25 years of experience in creating Life Skills training materials especially designed for at-risk youth and their care givers, ARISE Foundation recognizes that as good as our life skills training is, as successful as we might be in teaching them to at-risk youth, the troubled young man or woman with the best chance of success is the one who has those skills supported and reinforced at home.
The decor and ambiance of the Hollywood Tower Hotel blew me away, first and foremost. It was so eerie and so authentic. It really felt like I had entered a building that had suddenly been abandoned...everything still in the same places the guests had left them with cobwebs and dust covering them. Then we went to the library and watched the Twilight Zone movie. So so cool!!
NT 0870
and she couldn’t be loved;
The Definition of Insanity
It was worth all the work, just to see her wearing it with that sweet smile on her face.
So what are the new values? I asked.
(one of these days I’ll write about how allowing pharmaceutical companies to advertise was the worst thing ever, but today is not the day)
Acts 27:15
“We do see the same protective effects in the animal as if they were on a very strict diet,” said Sinclair.
Keep an eye out for updates and pretty things from the leading land of thrift.
Yeast: English Dry Ale
Recently, I’ve been gravitating towards comfort foods more then ever and I suddenly found myself really wanting meatloaf. How strange! I haven’t had meatloaf in years, but I couldn’t get it out of my head. Hm, but how can I get away with putting meatloaf on my blog?
Being cooped up in the house has gotten me caught up on my candle & tart orders~~~yeah! I've also come up with a few new recipes that I've shared on my website's RECIPE page :)
Whilst it is important to be aware that communication difficulties is a part of Autism, to me it is important to acknowledge that we too have a difficulty. They know what they want and don’t want. They know what they want to get across. They know what they feel. What they find challenging is finding a way to let us know what those thoughts and feelings are. Whilst they have a difficulty in producing the ‘right’ ways of communication, we struggle with understanding what they want to get across. Communication is a two-way process and since it is us (“neurotypicals”) who (ideally) have more capacity to be flexible and adaptable to situations, the responsibility to communicate effectively falls into our hands.
ABC: What would you like to tell your fellow publishers about the CMR?
Here is a simple Fall Garland that I put together today. It was very simple to do and turned out great.
This, by the way, is the same Töpfer that admitted to an “international consensus on worldwide population control” back in 2000.
P.S. If anybody knows who “Booger Suger” is… can you forward this to him/her and tell ‘em I have a heart, I paid it forward in my own way… and happy holidays from Maggie.
Add whatever additional filling you wish to have, and mix it all using a fork.
MYLUNE: So furry and handsome and such a good boy! Yes you are! You are! Oh yes you are, Mr. Wyvern…
I've had a craving for it all week.
Gentleman’s Relish is a cooking ingredient in its own right: the fish, salt and spices all provide a great seasoning to stews, especially lamb, and is great stirred into scrambled eggs. It can be melted upon steaks, or used as a simple sauce with pasta. It is also used to make another amazing savoury called Scotch Woodcock.
My friend Cindy was helping to plan a bridal shower for one of her best friends, and she asked me to make cupcakes for it. The theme was going to be "fairytale wedding", so I offered to pipe little tiaras to go on top of the cupcakes.
RIDA
I don't have anything against McDonald's food. I know it's been pretty fashionable lately to diss on McD's like they're trying to pass off buckets of carrot peelings and dirty air filters as sandwiches, but give me a break. A burger is burger is a goddamned burger. Fine, you're loyal to Sonic or In and Out, but this isn't rocket science. It's meat and a bun. It's a hard combination to fuck up.
I gave him The Tudors, he went off with The Greeks.
Across the water, rectilinear houses straight out of sixties futurist architecture, old english cottages, absolutely no coherence whatsoever on terms of overall architectural vision. My impression is that I've stumbled accidentally into a secret Hollywood movie lot.
4. How long have you been writing for?
Patty Peters, spokeswoman for the zoo, said a bear, two panthers and two primates will be sedated to be placed in steel crates that will transport them to Marian Thompson’s farm on Kopchak Road.
-you can count "two, three" - somehow you haven't quite grasped "one" yet though :)
The whole book.
the result was a very bright, slightly clinical space.
Because the food we eat plays such an important role in maintaining health, nutrition has been a key focus for research—not only what to eat but also how to grow and buy the right food and how to prepare it in a healthful way.
The first tea towel is a beautiful elegant one in shades of cream and caramel, with a beautiful silhouette of the Queen surrounded by deep red roses and gold flowers and foliage.
A pair of congressman are pushing for legislation to dramatically enhance training for educators who teach students with autism.
p.s. I'm trying a new comment widget... hopefully this one works a little easier!
I love the smell of lavender. When I returned to the US, a basket of dried lavender was packed away into one of my many boxes. It took awhile to find it but as soon as I opened the box and pulled out the basket, the room was filled with the scent of summer adventures in France. Bicycle trips, river rafting, hiking and wonderful dinners under the stars. It helped me feel at home again in my home country. Enjoy!
Asda’s warning came in an email from its headquarters in Leeds. Sent to 20 suppliers including Coca-Cola, it stressed that ‘standard packaging is to be sent to Northern Ireland and Scottish stores’, and asked for suppliers to list the products they intend to decorate with the flag, so Asda can ‘manage the distribution accordingly’.
It´s cold, but that´s cool. It´s still amazing fun to scamper up the mountain. Which is one of those types of fun where it´s super fun to say you did it, especially after, but during the scampering part it´s actually more like a ¨my chest is pounding so hard I can hear my heart in my ears, if they weren´t filled with the sound of whipping, howling wind¨ but at least I can know in my heart that it´s good for my health. If it doesn´t actually kill me first.
I’m not really surprised by his answer and I tell him so, “You are right right, son. But would you like to cook Indian food if you became a chef?” I ask.
Why did I start running? That’s a little different. I started running because I needed to feel my feet hit the pavement. Several years ago when my birth family told me to stay away, I felt . . . emotionally aborted. There was something really strange about being told by the two people (and my newly found siblings) who saw me come into the world to “stay away” that made me feel as if I didn’t exist–that I had no affect on people. Perhaps because I had put so much energy into finding them and friending them only to bounce off of a wall, I felt as if my life just bounced off of people. I began to wonder if I actually got through to anyone and made an impact, or if my efforts, my love, my care, my life just bounced.
We went into the bedroom where Gary started pulling out snapshots from the hundreds that he kept in two baskets by the bed, showing me Jerome people in their younger days, including quite a few children I now knew as nearly grown up, and many of Ferne.
Of course, Knox is pulling the “victim” card about freedom of speech and freedom of religion. Sorry, Viki. You don’t get to be both the persecutor and victim at the same time. If a comment by a teacher had been against blacks, Jews, Muslims, or any other oppressed and marginalized population, she would be fired. Shame on you Viki for not seeing how your comments only help to support a white, male, heterosexual power structure. Double shame because you are a teacher. When did you chose to be heterosexual?
Year that suddenly sang by the mouths of the round-lipp’d cannon,
It may not be obvious but, I’m as delicate as I am strong.
its happy anniversary
And then, W.B. started making up his own versions of Yankee Doodle, but instead of singing "Yankee Doodle went to town...", he sang, "Old Man Jenkins went to town..." which he claimed was funnier.
BLITZER: Governor Romney, the few times and I think it was only once, that they experimented with self-deportation, only a handful of individuals voluntarily left. What makes you think that — that program could work?
Managerial and professional: 14.6
Which in academic circles means it was pretty good. It had all the Gothic romantic elements: castles, skeletons, family secrets, missing and incomplete manuscripts, love, loss, suicide, murder, parricide, um, castles, banditti, oh yeah - monks. Um. I think that about covers it. Lots to deconstruct, unpack, problematize, New Historicize and aestheticize. And stuff.
That being said, I am going to post our actual table for our Easter brunch. Even thought things are busy, I am still visiting your lovely posts to see all of the pretty tables everyone has done. I apologize for the tardiness of my Easter post.
Of course, what is dead here are the brains of the reporter doing the reporting and the editor accepting the bs.
home maintenance
assets to her daughter Bobbi
Card Maker
All of the defendants who were arrested last night and this morning are expected to be arraigned on the indictment this afternoon in United States District Court in downtown Los Angeles. If they are convicted of the charges in the indictment, the current and former TSA officials each face stiff mandatory minimum penalties, and each would face a potential sentence of life imprisonment.
Egg-cellent egg-splanation if I do say so myself!
Not only that, she always wants the toilet a further three times during the meal thus rendering my food cold.
But, bless his heart, he saved the day when he got me a new phone. An iPhone4, to be exact. I feel I’ve, finally, ‘caught up’ with the rest of the world (ie; I now have a phone that does a bazillion cool things instead of a flip phone that…makes phone calls…). And, I’m finding, the “notes” application is really quite helpful. In addition to being able to take it into the bathroom with me, should I need it, *cough* I can make notes of things to remember, throughout the day, as well.
O! Icarus of the burning hair hanging like a mast on a convertible Jaguar XK140
Last weeks was list five things you love about the moon. I added some facts about the moon on my page as well. I doodled this in the evening then just added some watercolour crayons to the background and some silver pen.
How the brave new world arrives
NEW YEAR'S
The idea that the identity of the entrepreneur is a ‘fictional construct’ (du Gay, 2000), is helpful in ‘unmasking’ the theoretical and popular image of the entrepreneur. The argument here is that the entrepreneur, as with the emperor’s clothes, is an image from the outside and that behind the mask is nothing.
As one sun fell below the horizon, the other burned, given birth by the blast. It held him in it's fiery flame. He kept to the shadows, slinking through the rumble, seeking movement of the living. Was he the last of any kind?
From here, the unveiling of character depth, relationship ambiguity, gorgeously photographed tragedy, and self sacrifice come to the forefront in this complex, emotional, and often humorous look at Ford’s makeshift family. An involving film in every aspect of the word, Ford’s ability to tell this story while avoiding almost every time period and genre typecast is truly remarkable. 9.5/10
When planning for disasters, remember: pets are people, too!
(let go let go let go let go)
UNDEAD CREEP started as a project and then turned it into a real band.
And these are the last three dresses which I made with the fabric the lady at the carboot sale donated for the cause. That's three more little girls who will get a frock via the "Dress a girl around the world scheme". I only have a few small pieces of fabric left now so I guess I shall have a rest and stock up when I spot anything suitable.
I hope everyone has a great week of break or at school. Mine will be at school. Woohoo I am so excited!
Kaufman says some banks are so big that their failure could trigger a chain reaction in the financial system. The cost of borrowing for so-called too-big-to-fail banks is lower than that of smaller firms because lenders believe the government won’t let them go under. The perceived safety net creates what economists call moral hazard -- the belief that bankers will take greater risks because they’ll enjoy any profits while shifting losses to taxpayers.
REC’D TRACKS: This album is a whole-album listening experience. If you get single songs, the impact will be lessened. But hey, do whatever kids.
The following are the pictures of our little Sam and Samantha, the King and Queen of 'The Craft Emporium' of Maben, MS.
And then I remembered this young engineer, whose name is Tsengue Tsengue, student of the Ecole Centrale de Paris, who came back in his native country, namely the Congo, to patent several of his invention and install a factory which hired numerous young unemployed.
All the mistakes,
He can be very creative in these endeavors. He’ll bring her little gifts from the toy shelf or he’ll make up silly rhymes to make her laugh.
Paint - I used any latex I had laying around. Craft and house interior. The finished paint is white house ceiling paint.
7.Cardamom : 1
The movie was, in some parts, less plausible. It was different. Different is not a synonym for bad. Let me establish that before I go further. True, like any adaption, they changed the storyline.... just a little. At the end. And of course, the Seal People is an invented tribe for the film, and doesn't actually exist.
According to a 24-page booklet titled "A Story of Victor, " published by VictorInsulators in 1945, "The war gave impetus to the development of the chinaware business. Orders for greatquantities of rugged cups and bowls built to military specifications have beenand are being delivered to the Army and Navy.”
♥ Pour the batter into an 8x8 glass pan if you have one. Note: if you want to serve more people I would recommend doubling the recipe & using a larger pan. This is a pretty small serving.
Interpretations
17 assassin
OK, it wasn’t quite that bad – however, we were very tired after just a couple hours of sleep, and not completely on top of things.
All of the above indicates that the much-feared financial meltdown is no longer a distant and remote possibility because in fact it is already taking place. However, this chaos might trigger some very serious and preoccupying consequences. In order to have a clear understanding of these implications, it is vital to take into account some reports that were not given the proper amount of attention they deserved when they were first published.
words into
but being here is all i can see
like "that's a good punk song, but we're a ska band." So I decided I'd
Life can be ordinary but I want romance. It’s not too much to ask for is it?
The 4th Stray Cat Rock movie is yet another solid entry in the series. Whilst it doesn’t change that much plot-wise from the other three, it is still an entertaining and exciting movie for those that have followed them. The trademarks from previous movies (great funky music, colourful 70′s fashion and more singing inside a groovy nightclub) all appear once again and we even get to hear Meiko Kaji’s dulcet tones. By now Kaji had established herself as the star of the series and pulls in another fine performance although her role isn’t as strong as the previous movie (Sex Hunter) as the plot doesn’t directly concern her character. She still looks great in her white dress and black hat though. The supporting cast contribute hugely to the enjoyment of this movie especially Bunjaku Han, Eiji Go and Tatsuya Fuji who plays a nicer character to the one he played in Sex Hunter. So far the series has been rather tragic in it’s plotlines and that continues here. You didn’t expect a happy ending did you!!! One of the highlights is a rather cool sequence as the Alleycats head off to a Honda motorbike dealer and come back out in their mopeds and give chase to the Dragons’ leader Sakura in his side-car through various outdoor and inside locations.
I don’t have much, but it might amount to a mustard seed,
The majority of what I do will never be seen,
Jim-
Our genes explain why my sisters (equally fair skinned) can spend hours trying to get a tan and never get as dark as our neighbor, who is Italian, is during the winter months. I swear that girl walks by a window and gets darker! It’s funny that society now dictates that in order to be beautiful you have to be rail-thin and bronze, but back in the old days the plumper and whiter you were the better, because hey it meant you were rich. You were never for want of food and you didn’t have to be outside all day working in the fields. The girls of that era actually prided themselves on their porcelain skin and went above and beyond to protect it (think parasols and long gloves). That’s what I’m going with, I’m a descendent of the high-breds! ha, just kidding, but I have a serious point, trends change and don’t feel you are any less beautiful just because you don’t fit the mold. But I digress…
Also there was only last one left.
So........ here it is! Not my usual colour palette I know, but none the less I think it's worked out OK or maybe not LOL :/
It’s especially important to remember that in this case, where the defendant admitted manslaughter, but denied murder. The difference between the two offences is one of intent: killing is only murder if there is an intention to kill, or cause “really serious harm”.
Gabriel is True Chicken Farmer. He fell in love with Chickens and Chicks. Every morning he woke up, first thing he did was to check eggs. ANd he was very dissapointed when S. grandfather found eggs first.. So, we had REAL egg hunt... Jealous, You all???? ;)
4) Using editing apps too much. Sometimes people are like children in sweet shops when they discover the massive variety of apps you can use.
So, considering that the Romney’s purchased one home and sold two other homes, is he the person who should be asking questions about how hard it is to buy or sell a home?” I think not!
24. Little Bitch
Yesterday I had an incredible urge to pull everything out and re-organize! I moved cabinets, I cleaned cranny's I had neglected for months! I feel great and the shop looks so much better! I'll post pics as soon as my camera is charged up.
Pat Hingle's portrayal of Commissioner Gordon, I still find offensive. Barbara Wilson's Batgirl is needless. Michael Gough as Alfred remains the series' anchor, managing to bring dignity to every scene in which he appears.
3 tbsp water
More recently, chronic exposure to lead in the environment has been found to speed up the progression of kidney disorders in patients without diabetes.
Happy back to school, everyone!
"I like it. When we finish reading it can we watch the movie together?"
You can imagine what a bitter blow it is to me that all my long struggle to win peace has failed. Yet I cannot believe that there is anything more or anything different I could have done (apart perhaps from not talking to two young women who came to my constituency surgery) and that would have been more successful
I stopped as if I stepped on somebody’s cry,
But you know what? I don’t remember her yelling at me.
Soul Shoppe presents programs for elementary schools for all students, staff training or parent program to give your entire school community the essential skills needed to create a safe, loving and happy environment for all.
Both boys do not naturally write. When they were assigned something, they would certainly write: simple, brief sentences. And I tried..really...to Let. It. Go. and just let them write. But my inner B.A. English degree is difficult to repress. So I may have squelched their desire to write by editing and helping them to edit their own work. Sure, writers need to be able to check and fix their own work, and oh..uh...be able to read it for coherency, but my boys needed more time practicing putting all the random and plenteous thoughts bouncing around in their heads through their arms, hands and onto paper.
Local boys Hobo Jones and the Junkyard Dogs travelled all the way to a big city recently, all on their own. Someone had suggested they visit 'Britain's Got Talent' and, always eager to try a new pub, they removed their tags and went for it. They never found the bar, but someone let them play a few numbers instead.
* Vid link: via Johnny Dollar’s Place (J$P).
“We must have a bad connection. It keeps beeping and your father is asleep on the couch so it can’t be him.”
-Excuses Fat People Make – “I may be big, but I’m actually only 7% body fat!” Oh yeah? Well, you’re also 58% chocolate cake, so shut your sausage pit.
I wish you would stop fidgeting in class. And buy a new sweater vest, wearing the same one everyday is annoying. Maybe try something that isn't an Argyle pattern.
for eternity.
So far, my piano playing has improved. I’ve already noticed that I learn new tunes faster when I work on them everyday and not every other day. Or waiting for the weekend to hammer through the new music. As for my personal project, it is ahead of schedule. I even decided to put in extra features because of it.
This summer, we, the wife and I, met face to face with MoR and Flavia in Montreal then in Rome. Yesterday, in Montreal, we spent the day with Cheri and Judge Blah, nothing blah about the judge, a lively fellow and a pleasure to talk with.
Ali and Sugano said they’re dismayed by the lack of transparency about the process.
A Letter From Hiroshima, Suwa Nobuhiro, Japan. Drama, 37 min.
Ah freshman. You know, I spent my freshman (and sophomore) years of college a community college at home, where I was still sheltered and had consequences for staying up until 4 am and eating junk food until my teeth fell out. I didn't even think about drinking, because my mom would beat the hell out of my ass and take my computer and throw it out in the street and have the landlord block up the internet and so on. Freshmen who go straight off to college, however, don't have a v-chip on their life however.
1/4 tsp. Baking soda
Number one is grown now trans-gendered. Number two grew out of his effeminate ways by the time we hit high school, as far as I know he is married, straight with children. And number three, she’s still my home-girl, never looked at a woman other than to admire her dress, and is totally heterosexual.
When we first found out she was pregnant my sister in law mentioned wanting a sock monkey for the baby.
“You got time?” she asked?
I wish they had given a little more time and attention to this movie. Usually these superhero movies are trying to teach the audience something (most often a moral lesson of some sorts). It makes me think of the X-Men movie franchise, which were effective superhero movies that really will stand the test of time. Those movies usually taught me something about brotherhood, responsibility or acceptance. However, when it comes to Thor, I don’t think I left the experience knowing anything I didn’t already know. The conflict didn’t seem real or severe enough for its ending to feel gratifying; the climax of the film felt more like a bump in the road than a roller coaster. The movie seemed more like the introduction to the story, which is the main reason why I feel it didn’t live up to its potential. An epic character like Thor deserves an epic storyline; a storyline that sticks with its audiences and teaches them something special. However, what we’re left with is a mashup of cliche and laziness.
Well, here's your chance and a little motivation to help you get going.
Update: This actually cleared up a bit. Hopefully when I'm cleared to work out it will go away more...or else I'll have to table my dream of being a celebrity permanently because I'd always be featured in the "worst beach bodies" section of tabloids.
I posted a status on Facebook and told all my friends that I had been accepted to The movement. What was even more encouraging and awesome than all the well wishes was, within a day of doing that, several of my friends informed me that they wanted help me out by donating money and praying for me! God is so good!
9. iXpenselt
Coffee: 41.22 mg/lb, is down 22.3% for the year so far
Answer: Danny Lloyd! He was born in January 1973, and that film came out in May 1980, so maybe he was a bit older during filming, like 6 or 7.
I pray for God to make you aware
To experience a minute of this helicopter flight watch Bill's video.
Star Bar - One of the best kept secrets in Denver. A few buddies invited me out to this place and knowing that they were professional brewers I thought they were joking. It looked like just another dive bar with Karaoke and Coors Light. Well, they are a total Karaoke bar and they did have Coors Light, but they also had Russian River Sanctification, Avery Collaboration Not Litigation, New Belgium Le Terroir and Ooh La La on tap and an excellent selection of craft cans like Dale's Pale Ale and Modus Hoperandi. Proof that in Colorado, you can find great beer in even the most unlikely locations.
The shade replied --
And the result? A swift and summary rejection. How come? Because the Registration Officer, Hilary Woodward (a council employee) has ruled that, in her opinion, the public have always been able to use The Level ‘by right’ (i.e. in exercise of a legal right to do so), rather than ‘as of right’ (i.e. without permission, force or secrecy). [sec. 4] [See also "7.10 ‘Applications’ not duly made".] She thus felt able to reject the application without further ado on the grounds that it wasn’t ‘duly made’, since a necessary criteria in such a registration application is that the public’s use has to have been ‘as of right’. And so, with a fifty quid solicitor’s letter, the council reckons that it’s now hurdled the final obstacle and can steam ahead with its Meister Plan. Noteworthy, indeed, that an application to a council department dated 21 December is replyed to on 30 December–an officer replying to a letter in four days, and at Christmas! Methinks Ms. Woodward had one she’d prepared earlier.
Bodily, he trembled with memory. Passion. Desire. Her arms wrapped tightly around him. A scent of blossoms and warm spring rain swallowed him. A taste as sweet as honey filled his mouth. His arms entwined behind her back, fingers tracing the smooth lines of her back to the grace in her neck. Alex was lost in the crystal blue depths of her eyes again. Lips brushed, teased, embraced and devoured beneath the boughs of ash.
1 vermiform
2011-2012 Geoscience Student Scholarships. These awards offer financial
How about "The dog can't pee?".
The Plot: Blake, 15, has a GF (girlfriend), Shannon; and a girl who is a friend, Marissa. It seems possible to have two women in his life, despite the jokes his brother makes, until he discovers a secret about Marissa that he promises not to tell anyone.
Contact me at RMacleod at aol . com, and I'll give you the details.
Many of those spoken to last week said they had fled to South Africa to find food.
I’m reaching a touch here, but I swear to you, that’s what I thought of as I watched the shrimp tumble into the fire. I’m transitioning in life, switching up my nouns, from Comedian-Writer to Writer-Comedian and it’s been a lot of work, all over again. Just when I think I have it, I’ve forgotten to close the latch and I almost have to start from scratch, so to speak.
She says “Sir, we aren’t having a garage sale, we are just clearing out the Garage”.
be false
You see, I had a feeling the ad was not long for this world (unlike the Israeli Ministry of Immigrant Absorption*, for-profit businesses do a good job at covering their tracks), so I downloaded it a few days ago. And now, friends, I uploaded it – for your viewing mortification:
However, if the move is paid for by holding down the higher rate tax allowance – currently just under £43,000 – more people will be pulled into the upper band as a result.
Belittle Tebow if you must. But the trouble with shouting down Tebow’s religion, never mind the sheer offensiveness, is the same trouble with shouting down any other form of inspired expression. Do that, and you also shout down mystery, possibility, surprise. And some perfectly good questions. You drown out an awful lot that’s of interest, whether you agree with it or not.
2. Richard Longenecker, “the One and Only Son,” chapter 11 in The NIV: The Making of a Contemporary Translation (International Bible Society, 1991), p. 122. For his quotation of the passage from 1 Clement, Longenecker has used J.B. Lightfoot’s translation (without attribution), with only a few changes for the sake of modern English.
Seat 4: BluesGrinder ($22.60 in chips)
:::Deep breath:::
This year our district gave us a list of 100 words. Students need to know the first 50 to get meets standards and they work on the second 50 to exceed standards. Most of the words are in my beloved Dolch Kit, but they are pretty spread out. So, to end this super long story, I made this game to practice the first 50 sight words on our list and you can get it for free at my Teachers Pay Teachers store. It might not be exactly the same list you are working on, but I find that once they get about 50 words they start to pick up words really fast. Not to mention it's a fun way to practice sight words!
There are only two words that can describe the past month: March Madness and not the basketball type (thank goodness). I have spent the last two weeks living what I would consider a perfect life. During the first weekend of March I went on a trip to Torun with people from the international group (ESN). Torun is a beautiful city located 8 hours north of Krakow. We stayed in a hostel (where I was one of the lucky people to have a two person room) in the middle of the city. We went to dinners and clubs together and during the day we went on a tour of the city. Torun is the hometown of Nicolas Copernicus so we also visited an astronomical observatory (not as interesting as it sounds).
Lots of cards, I know. But the sponsor's images were just so fun and so many kids in the hospital over the holidays would love a fun card, so we just had to keep on stamping and sharing! Now it's your turn - stamp and blog a fun holiday card for a child, link it here and at Paper Creations Ink, and then please send it to SAS4Kids for our kids in Children's Hospitals. All the information you need is under the tabs at the top of our blog. Our challenge runs from November 5th until noon CST on November 18th. PCI's challenge is from November 7th until November 20th. Thanks for helping us if you can.
Also stay tuned to this blog-channel for details of the next music event headed to the Fort Greene/Downtown Bk area, it will be epic!
And here is what I came up with....
I lay there hiccupping and burping up sea water, feeling the skin on my back grow crinkled, as my fifteen minutes in the sun burned away.
I was talking to my friend, Maureen, today. She had posted several rosettes on her blog that she made with her Tim Holtz die. I told her I had just recently made my first rosettes and she asked me to post a picture. This is a Valentine I made for my husband to take to one of the ladies at the doctor's office. He had an appointment on Valentine's Day. The doctor has three great ladies who work in the office and he asked me if I would make them cards. It made me so happy I did when he came home and he told me they all really liked them and one of them said that it would be the only Valentine she received.
Today is almost
For additional commands, e-mail: alerts-help@lists.nader.org
(source: Tom de Wet). A black female clerk in civilian clothes cursed Rhona, shouting that they would have to contact the detective themselves, and to ‘fkoff’ out of her police station. Then a male uniformed police officer jumped over the counter and beat Pieterse in the face several times. The couple then asked other police officials at the station to help them lodge a formal complaint against the cop who had assaulted him – but nobody wanted to help. Eventually the detective they’d enquired after, came to the police station. And then Pieterse was beaten by the same cop again – in front of the detective, who intervened. Pieterse has lodged a formal complaint at the Virginia SAPS against the Welkom police man.SAPS captain Stephen Thakeng said ‘a senior officer will be appointed to investigate the complaint. If a guilty person can be identified strong action will be taken.’
Randi hopes rejoining her old band, 'Raptor Snatch,' will cure her depression. Music is more than just a job for Randi – it's the fuel for her rise from the ashes of the past eleven months. Nothing is going to stand in the way of her comeback. Nothing! Well, a jealous rival band is certainly going to try.
download below
There’s one more rehearsal with Jason’s/Jenni’s band tomorrow at noon.
Y'all have a perfect day and ever stop to think and forget to start again?
Wonderful rope… I also see it as a symbol of how, in a good relationship, you as a person, together with your partner, your lives become 'intertwined' and therefore so much stronger...
This is my personal cut file that I am gifting to you for being a follower. Please remember to give credit where credit is due. This is not to be sold this is for personal use only. I work hard on these and hope that you will pay it forward!
As for the story itself, it’s A Christmas Carol, and importantly, Zemeckis keeps Carrey contained inside his characters. Maybe Carrey’s at a point in his career where he just can’t go crazy for the entire shoot, or maybe the performance capture process forces him to play roles rather than allowing his roles to become a Carrey caricature. Whatever the case, he’s rarely been better than he is as Scrooge. He’s so good you rarely notice it’s him, whereas the Past and Present Ghosts see Carrey’s features shine through. I like how Zemeckis decides to have Scrooge spend Christmas dinner with his nephew, even if the performance capture version of Colin Firth is creepy to look at.
Ella celebrated her nine-month birthday on Thursday! I think of this as a landmark of her first year; not only is she 3/4 the way to turning one, but she now has spent just about the same amount of time on the "outside" as she did in the womb...crazy to think! And to make it even sweeter, she happened to be born on a Thursday, as well. :) Here's what she's been up to lately.
Each section of the book has pictures of NieNie and her family and I think it really helps to see her physical transformation from before the crash to after. You can watch a clip of her on Oprah and a video the Mormon church did of her story.
9. If I came to visit you in your current place of residence, where would you take me? How long are you going to be here for?! This is vital! We could go to the beach, go shopping in downtown SLO, go to Hearst Castle, drive up Highway 1 to Big Sur, go see the seals, go hiking, hit The Cliffs for happy hour and listen to some bands play...the possibilities are ENDLESS!
100g melted butter
Profit-driven manufacturing practices and outsourcing have brought about a collapse of the job market. To tell vulnerable people to “go and find work” is a contradiction in itself. It is a serious dereliction of responsibility by politicians who are viewed by many to have contributed to the present crisis.
Be careful what you say
Big Daddy also makes Grilled Conch, which is essentially the same ingredients as a Conch Salad, but wrapped in foil, and cooked on a BBQ grill with butter, garlic, and plantain.
Also taking an interest in this inheritance is Zoological Society president Gridley (Joseph Maher), who stands to inherit if Foster can't follow through on his end. Just to make sure that the Society does claim the inheritance, Gridley dispatches Society member Brandon (Rick Hurst) to hire the assistance of some local mobsters headed by Joey (Art Metrano) to wreak havoc and create lots of unrelated slapstick violence. Of course, not quite the havoc and slapstick violence that the orangutans unleash.
Substance abuse is certainly an issue among people of low income. Then again, abuse of prescription and illicit substances has been fashionable and destructive among the wealthy too. The key difference is not the fact of addiction; it is the degree of tolerance and support. There are also other forms of addiction that the better-off not only indulge but sometimes actually glorify. Examples include highly visible forms of inveterate thrill-seeking (e.g., extreme sports, gambling, stock trading) as well as various workplace pathologies (e.g., workaholism, aggression, corruption) (Sharma & Sharma, 2011; Turner, 2011; Burke & Cooper, 2010). All of these things seem much more agreeable when they are part of one’s own lifestyle, and they are portrayed as more agreeable by the literate classes that indulge them.
Among inhospitable and unforgiving seas stands Khalakovo, a mountainous archipelago of seven islands, its prominent eyrie stretching a thousand feet into the sky. Serviced by windships bearing goods and dignitaries, Khalakovo's eyrie stands at the crossroads of world trade. But all is not well in Khalakovo. Conflict has erupted between the ruling Landed, the indigenous Aramahn, and the fanatical Maharraht, and a wasting disease has grown rampant over the past decade. Now, Khalakovo is to play host to the Nine Dukes, a meeting which will weigh heavily upon Khalakovo's future.
Once you’ve mastered the rules, the following will come naturally.
sound like diginoise. the clicks were in the files before there was a
“Daddysangbassdude Radio!!!” Would you please give me a playlist? Which channel? Oh, let’s see, let’s go with my “Brand X Channel” for now. Yeah, I’m in the mood for some good jazz-fusion.
Here is something that will knock your baby's socks off. A vintage Sanitoy baby nursery dresser set. This thing is already going up in price on Ebay, but for the vintage mom or soon to be mom, I can not think of a better present. As a parent, you rarely spend this much money on an item for your baby, but for the office pool trying to figure out what to get her since she already got the stroller and car seat, this is perfect!
She had another MRI Done tonight and dr said "if you get a
As ReEntry--the new play at Round House Theatre in DC--demonstrates, post-deployment can be really, really, really bad. For everyone. Created by KJ Sanchez and Emily Ackerman, ReEntry is piece of documentary theater, the result of several years of interviews with a small selection of soldiers and their families. All the words spoken in the play come directly from these interviews and, as result, the text provides real insight into the post-deployment experience, which is one defined by trauma, anger, detachment, and all those other spiky emotions that so discomfit us.
This list below isn't inclusive, but it covers my normal modus operandi.
We ran south towards the ThunderDome. Surprisingly, given the HUGE numbers of people, I didn’t feel constrained. Maybe because I started far enough back? The support crowds were good here and I had my music on pretty high and felt good.
Jill would have been 41 today. Sometimes I think I should stop counting the years, but Jill and I were the same age, so I can't help but remember. Sometimes I wish her birthday would just escape my notice and go by without a thought, but I couldn't forget it even if I tried - I celebrated it with her every year for most of our lives, and it is permanently engraved on my mental calendar. I don't really want to forget anyway. Jill was a part of almost every memory I have from my childhood, and as we grew up our friendship always grew with us. I remember all of her birthdays, from balloons and princesses when she was 6, to her 35th and last.
08 - Straight Shooter 04:45
'No', he eventually got a word out. 'I'll be ok, it must have been a bad dream, stay at work. I thought you were all gone!'
faucet
Hope you have a beautiful weekend, Friends!
Till we turn’d menacing here, and then he left us.
I had a lot of fun blogging every day in April this year and I'm excited to challenge myself once more.
Well researches have studies the conspiracy phenomena know, and find that not only can people believe in multiple conspiracy theories, they can also believe in theories that are not compatible with each other. In the primary example, noted below, they address the idea that people believe that Lady Diana both staged her own death AND was murdered, and that Osama Bin Laden was already dead when the Navy Seals attacked, and that he is still alive.
And so, "Atheism turns out to be too simple. If the whole universe has no meaning, we should never have found out that it has no meaning; just as, if there were no light in the universe and therefore no creatures with eyes, we should never know it was dark. Dark would be without meaning."
The third period was all Devils, who would register four goals in the final twenty minutes. The game was tied by Adam Larsson, who took a pass from Zubrus and snapped in a wrister past Bryzgalov. David Clarkson would give New Jersey the lead when he put in a rebound after a shot by Zach Parise. Travis Zajac got the third goal for the Devils after a very nice play produced by Andy Greene. Zajac would score on the wraparound and tuck the puck into the net to give the Devils a 3-1 lead. Finally, a short-handed empty-net goal was put in by Bryce Salvador to seal the deal for New Jersey. After the Flyers pulled their goalie so they could get an extra attacker on a power play, they ended up losing control over the puck and Salvador bounced it across the ice and into the net. This was Salvador’s first goal since 2010, after playing a complete regular season this year.
axis;
The suggested theme for NaBloPoMo for October is "Play." That's probably not going to work. I mean, I'll try, but I am not in a terribly playful mood.
(D) You have previously published with traditional publishers but did not enjoy the experience or have a great amount of success.
A conscience doubtful and guilty
As she described in her post, the award comes with four basic tasks to be completed:
Corn flour, 3 teaspoons
Madhu Pandit Dasa (former name Madhusudan S) was born in 1956 in Trivandrum, India. As a pre-degree student, he was selected by the National Science Talent search program of the country. He completed his B.Tech in Civil Engineering from IIT-Mumbai in the year 1980. During his days in IIT, he became interested in the books of Srila Prabhupada, the founder-acharya of ISKCON. While he was doing his M.Tech course in IIT-Mumbai in 1981, he dedicated himself to the service of humanity by becoming a full-time member of ISKCON.
The mock battle ends and we return to the village, where the pig is led out. It’s a rather small pig, considering that we paid $150, and in the moment before its death, the tribe lowers its eyes and mumbles a few words in pragmatic deference to the Christian god. Then the squealing creature is hoisted aloft by two warriors, while a third shoots an arrow into its axillary artery.
Crone Moon
shapes of
copyright 2007 Lisa Call
I’m telling you, being challenged in my spiritual walk sometimes has some really odd consequences. I am reading a book that is challenging me on a lot of different levels. I am also challenging myself, getting rid of religious trash left and right. More of God, more of His Spirit, and less of the religion.
The referendum date was set out in the terms of the 2005 peace deal that ended the last bloody struggle between the north and the south, where most people follow Christianity and traditional beliefs.
Michal awoke at half past one and pulled his winter coat over his pyjamas. He was able to scoop up Haley from her bedsheets without waking her, and he snuggled her inside his coat, against his chest. She began to stir once her face was in the cold night air. Bruntsfield was like an underwater city, sunk at the bottom of the deepest of silences, and the LetsGo appeared to be deserted. Yet when Michal approached the automatic doors, they glided silently open.
The movie came out in 2002 and was directed by Adam Shankman. Naturally, I cried (just like you did) when I saw it, and continue to cry to this day. To answer your questions, yes I cried even harder reading the book.
All of these assessments, measurements, and tests are essentially designed the same way. When you design a test, no matter what it's purpose, you start out with a goal. For example, the goal of a Driver's License Exam is to ensure that new drivers are adequately prepared for everything they might encounter while driving, so they can be safe. The goal of a pre-employment test is to ensure that the test taker has the aptitude or ability to succeed in the job. And the goal of a scholastic achievement test is to ensure that students are learning the things that the state Department of Education believes they should learn. So, to one degree or another, all assessments start with a "performance standard", a minimum acceptable outcome, in mind. In other words, all tests know what "good" looks like.
This order may also prompt other countries, particularly developing countries to adopt similar provisions and issue similar orders. Lastly, one hopes that it prompts innovator drug companies to engage in more significant differential pricing schemes and introduce drugs at much cheaper prices in countries with a significant number of extremely poor patients such as India.
Finding that one is delving into the past, looking at relationships and gaining clarity on personal issues.
7 Les Demoiselles 3:59
Star Worms
But that kind of a day is normal for old people.
Oh, and we had some sun too!
Lee Seung Gi and Jung Yu Mi have been undeniably linked – but are they friends or foes?
Cinderella and Belle cakes
My host, the barman, was Stuart and, perhaps seeing my interest in the operation, he offered to walk me into the back of the building to see the tanks and the bottling line. Sweet! I gazed upon the tanks and had a peek at the bottling line, where they were just then in the process of bottling up their Vanilla Porter. Stuart stepped around to the line and, plucking a fresh bottle off the line, presented it to me as a memento of the visit. That was nice.
My husband was staring at me. “I think you were down in that cave too long,” he said.
Mark the time: June 21st, 7:28 AM – warm summer days beg
to save you
I know when I name a blog title, I take some thought in the process. What is the blog about? Is it serious? Is it silly? What do I want people to come away with? The same applied when we named our children. Nicole, Thomas and Samuel. We wanted names that weren't that popular. That were traditional and strong names. Names that people would remember. I also wanted names that had strong meanings:
And it is.
I am part of that, and it makes me nauseous.
… largely by a secular elite and the academic news media and judicial areas. And I frankly believe it’s important to have some leadership that stands up and says, enough; we are truly guaranteed the right of religious freedom, not religious suppression by the state.
In these times lots of people are paying close attention to their personal finances and to help them Paul A. Tucci has written The Handy Personal Finance Answer Book ($19.95, Visible Ink Press, softcover). His book avoids jargon while providing some good, fundamental advice anyone can apply. Combining recent data and findings, the book features financial information suitable for a wide range of ages and is particularly useful to the neophyte, perhaps just out of college or starting a new career or business. These are things rarely taught in school at any level. How do you balance your check book? What are the most common mistakes investors make? What should one consider before investing? And much, much more. To get real control over your financial life and your future, this is an excellent book. A useful book for those who have over-used their credit cards is Harvey Z. Warren’s Drop Debt: Surviving Credit Card Hell Without Bankruptcy ($14.95, Greenleaf Book Group Press, softcover). Warren, a debt relief expert has helped thousands of families find relief from debt and has written a book that will help the reader negotiate with creditors, explains why minimum payments on your credit card debt can hurt your credit rating, how to use a debt-settlement company, and much more. This is the kind of critical information that those in debt need when they are feeling the pressure and often desperate to find a way out. Instead of making more bad decisions, the book steers the reader in the right direction.
Shown from left: Bubblegum, Dark Brown-Pink, Pink and Shocking-Pink styles.
It was a relief when the Duke gave us permission to eat our chops with our hands. Miss Pucci has no qualms - she eats everything with her fingers. Messily, but with great delicacy. Then she dips her hand in the water glass for a quick rinse. The table looked like the scene of utter carnage what with all those bones.
Just stuff...
And communists and queens!
Now this one used diodes also, but I figured I could bypass that nifty-keen aspect and replace the light-sensitive timer with a manual lamp timer. Winner, winner, chicken dinner (for me, not the foxes).
There are stories, however, in which we can accept the stated intentions of the author, that is, when the story itself is so explicit about the ideas it embodies that it seems more like an essay than a story. Wendell Berry wisely admits that “Nothing Living Lives Alone” imposes “some strain on the term story,” for it is part of a longer work, he says, in which he tries to “deal directly and explicitly” with what he sees as the “paramount change” in his time and place from the “creaturely” to the “mechanical.” The story announces what it intends to illustrate in the first sentence: “Andy Catlett was a child of two worlds”—which Berry describes as the “town-world” and the “home place.”
"Thinking Of You" by Christian Kane
Johnny is no stranger to the stage! Back in the 90s, he was a member of the band P, that included Flea from Red Hot Chili Peppers and Steve Jones from Sex Pistols.
Many of the Galaxy S III advantages are software-related (S Voice, Smart stay, etc.) or narrow wins in terms of hardware (screen size, thickness). And it even gets more complicated with things like battery life. Sure, the S III has a bigger battery (2100mAh), but the Exynos chipset lacks the extra power-saving core of Tegra 3.
I would love to hear some of your goals for 2012.
Panic rushed to my head. “Bryant.” The panic dropped to my stomach and I felt sick. How could I go from feeling so happy and amazing to feeling the gut-clenching guilt I felt now? “I totally forgot about him.”
I'm making another Ysolda project...her Snapdragon Tam. I purchased her two books (Whimsical Little Knits and Whimsical Little Knits 2) back in February for a Haiti fundraiser that ravelry had. I've always loved pretty much everything that Ysolda does (and she's a total sweetie! I met her at my LYS a few years back). So when I found out that my high school drama director has breast cancer, I knew I was going to make her a hat. And I knew it would be a Ysolda pattern.
It was thought Rodriguez, who died in 1995 at the age of 74, scored 235 official goals for Barcelona, but that figure has now been revised to 232 following a study by the club and La Vanguardia newspaper.
The rain join me in my sorrows to share.
- No work previously exhibited at the Islip Art Museum will be accepted.
and I think it made a sweetheart of a pull shade.
The image is by Lori Whitlock
The Epistle of James is addressed to Jewish readers, and James the Just (3) seems to have been particularly concerned with the Jewish Christian community. It is accordingly plausible, and customary, to identify James the Just (3) with James the Writer (4).
J.K. Rowling read from the first Harry Potter Book and answered questions at the annual White House Easter Egg Roll. Best guest at the Easter Egg Roll? I think so. Here’s a video. It’s slightly blurry and a little delayed, but it is the only one available. Enjoy watching Ms. Rowling being super as always.
Your body has an average of 5.6 liters of blood, which circulates the entire body 3 times in one minute. That means that your blood travels 12,000 miles in a single day! In one’s lifetime your heart will pump about 1 million barrels of blood! That will fill more than 3 super-tankers! That’s a lot of blood. So now that you know just how hard your heart works for you with every beat, let’s talk about how to protect it!
death
“So be it,” the dragon crackled menacingly.
I let go of my pride of not having the perfect life.
Ignorance, as well as disapproval for the natural restraints placed on market excesses that capitalism and sound markets impose, cause our present leaders to reject capitalism and blame it for all the problems we face. If this fallacy is not corrected and capitalism is even further undermined, the prosperity that the free market generates will be destroyed.
“It would be counter-productive,” I said.
Merpel, on the other hand, points out that she has much less sympathy with the patentee. Didn't he have several timely reminders and a total period of 9 months during which he could have paid the renewal fee? If he was so cash-strapped not to be able to afford to pay renewals on time, how much was his patent really worth, in its 13th year? Merpel thinks that this case is a good demonstration of why one should not play the risky game of leaving things to the last minute.
Another outdoor activity I am taking part in is a kettlebell class and as promised note the photo above. Unfortunately, the kettlebell sessions only come in groups of four so they will be done soon, but it is another excuse for me to play outside. I mean who wouldn’t think swinging around ridiculously heavy medieval looking objects would be a good time, and then couple it with being outdoors and you basically have a party!
Saison 7%
Continuing the festive feel i have made some Christmas inspired bunting for my kitchen! Im quite pleased with how it has turned out. I made it from felt. Just cut the shapes out and then sewed buttons and ribbons on to the trees and gingerbread men and then stitched them on to a length of ribbon. It brightens up a normally dull corner in the kitchen.
OH and remember i asked your advice on "Bag Decisions"? - well i was THIIIIS close on clicking 'confirm' on a large Chloe Paraty bag yesterday - but i somehow got myself to click the "X" on the top of the screen - WHY? - well with research i found the CC Skye Onie bag in the color taupe! - i'm thinking it will be PERFECT - it hasn't be 'released' yet, so i'm in contact with the buyer to get the 411's - and i think THAT will be my new bag! - and will save me a TON of $$$!!!
Business Lists
Everybody’s heard of lemon curd. Cranberry curd is tart and delicious like lemon curd, but it is even more better! The awesome color alone sets it a mite above (although LAYERING cranberry, lemon and lime curds on, say a crepe cake would be UH-mazing) and it has crazy character and of course, the element of the unexpected. Pair it with scones (I used the above recipe and then added fresh cranberries, ginger and almonds) and you’ve got a not-too-sweet surprising holiday dessert that people will think took forever, but it really didn’t.
So nice that the government has so much tax payers money to throw around, aide, welfare, the Soviet EU, it goes on and on. The taxes go up the borrowing continues. This ‘conservative government is just neoLabour, exactly what they do, tax, borrow waste and spend. Every party’s policy.
and happy spring
The figures were discovered following research into the drinking habits of 214 people in Liverpool, Manchester and Chester.
When did Lost turn into a spaghetti western. (BTW, its what I had for dinner tonight, at the Grand Lux restaurant inside the Venetian hotel in Las Vegas) Just like an old time Western, we got the MIB (The bad guy) going to the sheriff (Dogen) of the town of Temple and telling him he has until sundown to get out of town or else he’s going to kill everyone. Has the Lost island somehow magically transported back to the wild, wild West days or does this chain of events of what we witnessed tonight strengthen my theory even more.
The Truth Seeker's Guide.
“You’ve sprinkled chilli powder on the floor of your balcony?” I asked.
Yep, that’s me all day.
So he told me to get upstairs and he would show me how wrong I was. It wasn't terribly horrible compared to what most people get, but it hurt really bad because my skin is so sensitive right now on top of the fact that I haven't really been spanked much. It was enough to make me sorry though! Then he proceeded to tell me that for the next couple of days, I was going to be spanked since I obviously felt that he wasn't spanking me enough and that I had gotten too big for my britches.
Wishing you and your families a Happy Easter, take careX:)
Off to the Weary Boys in the tent. They had the tourists clapping and jigging around in the dirt and sounded awesome. I remember when the original festival was packed with Austin acts. Now I think you can count them on two hands. It's a shame, but the Boys did Austin proud.
Anyways, after discussing this whole ridiculous morning with Edward, we came to the conclusion that this was all a result of me holding Eleanor at the bowling alley. And I am pretty sure we hit the nail right on the head. Jealousy reared it’s extremely ugly head again. It’s almost frightening how quickly things can go from good to bad when Vincent imagines some slight against Eleanor. Or perceives that she is encroaching on what is his valuable time with one of us. Mostly with me.
As a pulp fan/researcher, I absolutely appreciate all the little bits of biographical information in the editor's introduction to each article and in the articles themselves. Putting a personality and background with the authors who I read in the pulps is rewarding, and learning about the editors who heretofore were often only a name is great fun. Locke does an excellent job of giving a glimpse inside a wide number of publishers' outfits (Munsey, Street & Smith, Doubleday, Dell, Columbia, Popular, Fiction House, many more) and represents authors that were prolific as well as relatively new to the field. Some of the writers of the particular articles include the likes of Harold Hersey, E. Hoffman Price, Arthur J. Burks, Ray Palmer, Mort Weisinger, and Robert A.W. Lowndes. I'd be curious to see a second volume in the series, as this volume was both fun and enlightening. I see the editor now has out a couple of volumes with selections from and information on MacFadden's Ghost Stories, I'll have to check them out.
O, you should hear my funny voice.
The truth is that so much of our behavior is automatic. We develop patterns in our lives and we often just follow the same routines day in and day out. Some are good and some are bad. The habit of going to worship every week is good. Smoking is bad. Going to bed at a reasonable hour is good. Eating at fast food restaurants is bad. Yet we follow these patterns unless something happens that forces us to stop and think about what we are doing. The accident did that for me. A health crisis does it for others. A break down of a relationship also works in this way.
Several workers also accuse Roosevelt HS campus custodian Trifon Radef -- paid more than $170,000 annually after 36 years of service for the Department of Education -- of splitting school funds with pals for whom he created no-show gigs.
It's the thought that maybe some day I'll forget what her voice sounds like. That's the unthinkable.
Pulled the onions August 27. It was a really good crop this year-a lot of big ones. This is not all of them--I filled my little wagon too. I have more than enough for the year for us-and I have plenty to share with the neighbors.
You've got something jammed in here real good.
47. Wacky Races
If they are, I'm hoping to attend the one at the Vale of Glamorgan pub on the high street as i did last year. An excellent real ale pub normally they have stillage out in the courtyard, it was packed last year.
the british had started a fight
From the graphics, please note that government debt is at RM455.7 billion as at 2011. And the deputy finance minister tells Malaysians in Parliament not to worry because we are still less than 5% away from the critical financial level.
As a result of this, I was able to look into the face of this little blessing that was ever by my side or in my lap as I began writing about this choice. Sobbing commenced as I wondered if my aborted child would look similar to Joshua. Would the baby have been a boy or girl? Would she know from her place in heaven how sorry I was and that I actually love her? How could I possibly destroy something so amazing?! How could I not have known? I looked down at him as I was nursing. What sin have I committed, what dysfunction in my life, or what self-centeredness, could possibly merit depriving the world of this life! There is no such thing!
Be prepared to surrender your duality and accept the downloads being offered to you. One of the best ways to keep in balance is to have integrity with our attitudes and thought forms, keeping our aura clear to give and receive. Negative thought forms will block our aura which in turn creates fear. So see you aura like it is a computer and defrag it regularly.
I have an episode guide to the Simpsons....from 1997. Kinda incomplete at this point. Anyways, the Futurama movie Bender's Big Score that just came out was pretty good -- a little too "let's make sure we include every minor character in this somehow" to be great, but still a good deal. I believe there are 3 more movies in the pipeline, so that's encouraging.
My boss is really nice. I was sitting with her yesterday going over some stuff (she was kind of quizzing me to see how I was catching on) and we were talking about stuff and I said something about not wanting to talk badly about my last company since they were so good to me when we lost Cadynce, and we got off on a whole tangent. It turns out she has had recurrent losses. Lost a son in the 2nd trimester with a cerclage, then went on to have a TAC, then got pregnant again with IF treatments, waters broke at 20 weeks and was in the hospital on complete bed rest, at 24 wk 5 days the baby had no AmF left so they did a c-sect. her daughter was in the NICU for 4 months, but it a healthy normal 3 year old now.
Hex replies that there ain't no such thing, just resourceful men. Maybe someone was looking out for Avram. Avram chuckles and agrees that it was "someone". Jonah comments that Avram will make a nice rabbi and hands him a book, a Hebrew prayer book given to him by John Sutter to pass along. As Jonah rides off, Avram reads from the prayer book and the story closes with a dedication to John Albano Sr. and John Albano Jr.
Even if the proponents are telling the truth about the relatively limited purview of the FDA, can they guarantee us that the agency will not grasp for a broader jurisdiction? Can the advocates assure us that Monsanto and ADM with their unlimited funds for lobbying and bribery will not seek to have naturally grown products regulated beyond the cost of production? Can those who seek this legislation honestly promise that the entire food supply of the United States will not, at some future point, be limited to genetically engineered products whose bad effects or side effects may not manifest themselves for a couple of generations? Yes, they may guarantee, they may assure and they may promise, but their statements are as worthless as lips on a chicken.
That afternoon, my friends and I had a break and decided to bundle up and take a walk. We head upstairs to get our shoes and sweaters and jackets from the bedroom area. I don't have a good spot to sit down so I say that I'm going out to the main room to put on my shoes. This is a room with couches and you have to pass through this area to get to the dorm area.
I appreciate that my mom never forced me to draw, and she also knew that I wouldn't have listened to her if she had tried to give me advice anyways. She would always tell me "Don't get a degree in art (like she did), you'll never make any money." I also was never good at drawing hands or people realistically enough for my mom (she was a landscape and portrait painter and I still can't draw people up to her standards). Now my mom has said many times that she wishes she were 30 years younger so that she could do what I do now.
But every time I do have a chance to tell people something about my beliefs, people are kind and respectful. People are definitely more open and less prejudiced nowadays, than perhaps one or two generations ago. Some will ask questions out of genuine interest, and some will feel really awkward in that typical Finnish way and quickly change the topic. ;)
A warning about cooking polenta: this stuff literally bubbles like lava when simmering, spewing crazy-hot corn grits everywhere. Keep a lid on it between stirrings, and watch those forearms!
Pounds to reach goal of 113 - 37 pounds
HEXAGORA, which will be released on November 30th this year, is a four-part adventure for the Fifth Doctor, starring Peter Davison as the venerable Time Lord, Janet Fielding as Tegan, Sarah Sutton as Nyssa, and guest-starring the imcomparable Jacqueline Pearce (of Servalan fame in BLAKE'S SEVEN), as the domineering Zafira.
Unfortunately, the agreement is silent on how the existing deployment model should be improved.
Shredded Mexican blend cheese (such as Colby, Monterrey, Pepper Jack, Queso)
PRAYER FOR THE SEVEN GIFTS OF THE HOLY SPIRIT
Call 1-888-517-0394 today to get started with the best deals from DIRECTV!
So here is my question. The next time you are tested or have a thorn in the flesh as Paul did, how will you respond? Feel free to share your thoughts with me.
Omigod, I don't even know where to start. I've got about half a dozen different posts percolating in my brain: what I've been up to this past week, a post about what I'm reading (which is really What Are Y'all Reading?, of course), a post about what SoulWear is, a post about a new thang I want to try, a post about why The EGE was up all night long, spending part of the early morning hours in a tree in our backyard, all while I slept on, oblivious. Just a ton of stuff. For now, though, I'll start with this: it seems the most pressing in my brain~~)
so from today early nights are starting inshaALlah - well Isha is 11pm ish so still wont be that early!
Let the sunshine in... (Do I start to sound like Disney now?)
Back in July lots of people thought Cults were joking when they said they were planning on releasing a hip-hop mixtape as their next project. Well, five months later it seems the jokes on those folk as the pair are gearing up to unleash it early next year.
My stomach had already been in knots all day, the last thing I needed was a knock at the door just as I was stepping out of the shower...........
2. Visibility
Ok, I don't make beads. I don't make ceramic or clay or glass or stone or metal anything on my own. But gosh, I LOVE ceramic lately. It is my 1st choice for pendants and beads lately. Look at my shop - you'll see an influx of ceramic in my work about six or more months ago. I still use other beads - mostly glass and stones, but sometimes some metal sneaks in. But the majority of the pendants I use lately are ceramic. I admit, I don't know the difference between ceramic or clay or porcelain, which I SHOULD because I'm sure there's LOTS and LOTS of chemistry involved in those differences. In fact, I'm going to go look it up right now. (Can anyone tell I'm in work avoidance mode? I'm supposed to be grading finals and notebooks right now!)
Why is this film called Frankenstein Meets the Wolf Man? It should be called The Wolf Man Meets Frankenstein! Wolf Man owns this film! This could have been the perfect sequel to the wonderful 1941 original Wolf Man, but the addition of Frankenstein’s monster does muddy things up a bit. We begin a few years after the original Wolf Man ended. Bludgeoned to death by his father with a sliver walking stick; Lawrence Talbot now lies in the family crypt. Two men break into the crypt in hopes of scoring some booty and inadvertently awaken the Wolf Man. Talbot awakes disoriented in a hospital in another town. When questioned, the confused Talbot can not recall the events that brought him there. He does however remember his name is Lawrence Talbot and he hails from Llanwelly. When they check with the Llanwelly authorities they are told that Lawrence Talbot is dead. Talbot begins to recall the strange and horrifying truth of his existence. Desperate to be rid of his curse he escapes from the hospital. He sets out to find Maleva; the old gypsy woman whose son was responsible for his infliction. He finds Maleva who agrees to help him. Maleva knows of a doctor by the name of Frankenstein who may be able to help Talbot.
Turkuazとはジャカルタにできた新しいトルコ料理レストランです。トルコ人のオーナーであり、シェフでもある方は、以前長い期間クマンにあるアナトリアというレストランで働いていたそうです。一緒に居た友人は、地中海料理が食べたいということで、クマンのアナトリアか、友人が勧めてくれた新しくグナワルマン通りにできたトルコアーズどちらにするか考えていました。私は行った事の無いレストランへ行くのが好きなので、結局トルコアーズへ行くことにしました。トルコアーズに行って良かったです。友人と二人でとても満足してレストランを後にしました。ベジタリアンのメインコースだと50,000ルピアから90,000ルピアくらいで、お肉が付くメインコースは110,000ルピアから200,000ルピアくらいでした。パセリ、トマトとクスクスのサラダ（タブーリ)は、45,000ルピア程でした。今回のランチには、一人200,000ルピア(US$22)ほどになりました。
“Tango is more than just a dance or a sequence of steps. It is an expression of our emotions, an inner reflection of who we are and what we experience, a way to channel what we feel through movement. Tango is a language of expressing what we feel through motion, stirred in us by music, in unison with our partner. It comes into your lives in many different ways, as simple interest, a hobby, or a fascination… and ever so slowly it becomes an addiction.
Does anyone have a reasonably priced source for envelopes for square cards?
While I’m on the work subject, several months ago I came across a wireless headset. It’s the same one I see a few people at work (especially supervisors) use. These things are expensive. $300 new. It was Jim’s from a previous job. I tried to make it work but I guess I didn’t have the connections right and my clients were never able to hear me. I tried this thing several times. Recently I once again found it in a box and decided to try again. A supervisor helped me with the various settings and viola it worked. I’m on the phone all day and love the ability to roam between calls. It’s like I’m in an off-leash park! I can’t go very far since as soon as I get a call I need to take action on the screens. If I had known this was so perfect for me, I may have paid $80 on eBay to get one. Woof, woof.
-A thank you for all your nice comments yesterday making me feel better about myself over lil miss kitty
Other features include an Opera Web browser, a 3.5mm headphone jack for playing audio files, Bluetooth 3.0, a microSD memory slot with up to 32GB support, and a 950mAh battery that gives you up to 350 minutes of talk time.
The most exciting time I spent away from blogland was the weekend of April 17th. I fulfilled three Bucket List items that weekend and had one of the most glorious times ever with my BFF. I went to Dallas to have my girls weekend (check!) and we went to an AMAZING drag show (check!) at the Rose Room. I am now obsessed with drag queens--I LOVE THEM! The next night, I had a whole lotta shots and got my ass up on stage and sang karaoke (check!) with the girls! I can't put into words how fun this weekend was (although I tried!) and how much it meant to me. My BFF is amazing. She has been such a big part of my life...for almost 20 years...and I love her til death do us part.
I will also admit that I did get an additional morale boost last month when someone we all read decided to use his status to bring attention to smaller film blogs including mine, for which I am eternally grateful. It always encourages me when someone I respect and, in this case, idolize, reads what I write and does not think I am completely off my rocker. I do hope to further evolve this blog to see what else I can get away with. I have some pieces cooking for the future, as well as some interesting projects elsewhere that may be featured here, one of which I am particularly excited about.
Senator says Secret Service brought TWENTY prostitutes to hotel - as it is revealed agents BRAGGED about protecting Obama while partying at Colombian brothel
I stumbled across this new blog Cookies and Cups and saw a post for these adorable spring push-up pop cupcakes. It struck me that these would be perfect. I got my hands on some push-up pops and away I went.
It is not clear whether Chesterton's Orthodoxy, published on September 25, 1908, had any direct influence on Baring's conversion, but considering Baring's admiration for Chesterton's earlier works and his growing fondness for the author, it would be surprising if he had not read Chesterton's hugely influential volume in the months immediately preceding his reception into the Church on February 1, 1909.
LA * Austin * Nashville
According to Title Two of the Local Government Code, a candidate for mayor must be a registered voter in the city where he or she intends to run for at least one year before the day of the elections. Domagoso’s decision to break from Lim and align with Estrada is somehow befuddling since the latter is already seeking his third and final term. Given that they ran together in 2010, it is likely that Lim would anoint Domagoso as his successor once he becomes term-limited.
Today, he told me the story of Lacey, his dog. He had rushed to the vet one day with his old Bulldog, because the dog had overheated. The dog didn’t survive the night. But the next day, the vet called him and told him about an older lady in the neighborhood who’d had a heart attack, and she’d died, leaving this white/yellow mixed breed. The vet offered her to Mr. Sherrill. She was named Lacey, and she went home with him that afternoon.
The U.S. Conference of Catholic Bishops (USCCB) is criticizing the House Republican budget authored by Rep. Paul Ryan for cutting food stamps and other assistance programs for the poor.In a letter sent to the House Agriculture Committee on Monday, the bishops say the budget fails to meet certain “moral criteria” by disproportionately cutting programs that “serve poor and vulnerable people.”
"Hell...if I know," the Bartender replied, snickering.
Scotty’s Brewhouse Downtown Indianapolis has just tapped Widmer Brothers Dark Saison! You can come by every Wednesday and enjoy a 48oz Pitcher of this amazing Saison for only $9.00!
Ironically enough, my favorite medium is now acrylic. When I was teaching my high school students how to paint, I fell in love with acrylics because of their forgiving nature and the ability to add numerous layers of color. As a result, I am no longer afraid of color OR painting!
So, looks like that’s what happened. Damn, now I’ve got a bunch of money tied up in a non-leveraged asset currently at a loss. I’ll wait it out a bit and see what happens over the next week or two, but this is clearly not the best use of my money.
If you look at the enlarged picture above, you may be able to tell that the segment of the necklace I have been working on looks different from the portion to the right of it. It is much fuller.
Sticker Shape: Standard Stickers
PHOENIX (AP) – The Arizona House is scheduled Wednesday to debate and vote on a sweeping bill to strengthen immigration enforcement laws.
18.You don’t have to put up with over-night pajama parties.
Only brags when he’s done something brilliant. For millions of years. Its worse if you doubted him. (Torres’ hat trick)
If I had a girl I would be thrilled and sad simultaneously. I would be able to know what it was like to live out some of the fantasies of raising a daughter that only exist because Camille was Camille. The sad part is that another girl is not Camille and can not replace her. I don't want heart and mind confusion about that whole replacement dilemma.
Now back to the fancy shmancy camera Mr. Genius got, let's compaire a picture that I took with my phone and what a picture looked like the real camera looks like. Cuz I know there are some people out there that can't tell a different...*cough*cough* mom *cough*cough*
Some of you would recognize Kelvin Blacklock as one time London SS member and in and around all the major originators of the punks scene.
There was a gabble of rough voices below then they heard a human shout, Derue yelling for quiet. Gytha helped Telenstil down the last step. They paused to listen before entering the huge room itself.
For the record, our broadcast from Lockhart River went without a hitch. We slept well that night in the teacher house, and had a visit from a lively horse very keen on some mangoes that had fallen from a tree in the yard.
* Serve cold.
peanuts -2tsp
4 Pony Blues
Uninterrupted sequence heavily re-edited by Richard, "stained" through superimposition of a flickering effect covering the whole running time. In addition, the decision to opt for a B&W format which, associated with shadowy timbres of sound, gives a retro feeling to the footage.
Garnets provide a strong help to balance your energy system, stimulate your desires and uplift your attitude. Draws happiness, power, possessions, and peace to you. Aids in patience, persistence, sexuality, and purification. Sharpens self-perception. Increases creative energy and sexual appetite. Enhances bodily strength, endurance, and vigor. Protection against thieves. Helps to align the emotional body to the spiritual body. Sleeping with it will help you remember your dreams.
Lead Guitar,Vocals-Randy Bachman
The new songs have a big, modern polished sound, but with that warm, fuzzy, hard-hitting Rick Rubin feel to them. Linkin Park has evolved from MTV frat-house faves into a class act and MC Mike Shinoda makes that clear in the rap-heavy joint “Until It Breaks” off Living Things. Over a bed of big healthy drums, he confidently spits, “I’m a Banksy / You’re a Brainwash / Get the picture like that?” Yes, we get the picture.
Heaven I beg you
This may be more important than the congestion-fighting mentality I've described in recent posts in accounting for the proliferation of park-and-ride lots and garages in transit systems new and old. Both ideas flow from, and reinforce, the Kotkinist idea that the ideal commute is a solo drive in a personal car from the driveway of a single-family home to a parking lot.
I suppose right now is the ideal time to state my reasons for disliking Alice. To put it quite frankly, she was rather dull. I'm sure that she's a good ruler and all, but I found her segments to be something akin to reading wall paper. Floral print wallpaper, of which I cannot stand. The characters around her were perfectly abidable. Dodge was rather entertaining, if somewhat flat at points, and Bibwit seemed like a lovely person. At first, I wasn't too concerned with Hatter Madigan. I wrote him off as just another incarnation of the Hatter that I wasn't to concerned with. By the end of it, in which some stuff which includes character development ensued, I did care a little more about him. Sort of. In the way you 'don't really care' about your math marks. Right now, I cannot think of more constructive things to say on people, since my mood has turned from not completely there, to not completely there and bitter.
I am a mom who worries more than most, a mom who freaks out pretty badly...I am a mom that wants my daughter to see and do everything she has ever dreamed of...and I am a mom who is afraid I will be the thing that holds her back.
“They’re not planning for the future because they don’t have as much disposable income,” Cline said.
Nietzsche sees this as an act of self-preservation, or self-assertion: “it rendered possible to the horde of mortal, weak, and oppressed individuals of every kind, that most sublime specimen of self-deception, the interpretation of weakness as freedom… as merit”
Here is his close up of his favorite things and his handwriting. The thing that cracks me up the most is his special “S” because I remember doing those when I was in middle school, hahaha. ;)
Of course, I only play it until I get bored too, and it doesn't take long. It is, after all, a cartoon game on the computer.
Judy Wise Film. I'd love to compose and direct fantasy stories with ravishing heroines and sensitive men who are brave and wonderful and who save the world from greed and over-population. lol. Now that would be quite a story.
By he look on his face, I’m sure the Cheesehead thing is WHEY over his head…
Hello ladies! Lisa B here. I will be your host for this fabulous challenge. I hope you are all having this beautiful weather like we are here in Pennsylvania. It is gorgeous weather that my whole family is totally taking advantage of.
Corpus Christi, Texas; Hawk Ridge, Minnesota; Bake Oven Knob, Pennsylvania, and Cadillac Mountain, Maine, are now open. The best day of the past week was Tuesday, August 16, when much of the eastern U.S. was under a nice, little high pressure system. The total number of raptors seen at the ten reporting sites that day was 207, including a total of 18 Bald Eagles and 94 Broad-winged Hawks, 50 of which were seen at Pennsylvania’s Hawk Mountain Sanctuary, currently the season’s leader in total raptors with 230.
The main problem with the Nowak et al. paper is this: they see the failure of asymmetrical relatedness to explain social insects as a general failure of kin selection to help us explain those groups—or anything at all. That’s just wrong. There are alternative explanations for how relatedness explains the evolution of social insects (see the two papers by Strassman and Queller), including the phenomenon of sterile castes. And, although Nowak et al. claim that “the production of inclusive fitness theory must be considered meagre,” there are many aspects of eusociality that have been profitably investigated, and explained, by inclusive fitness theory. Here are just a few: why worker bees commit suicide when they sting; why, when a honeybee colony divides, the remaining queen goes around stinging to death all the other future queens in their cells; why workers prefer to raise rear queens in colonies where their mothers have mated only once, but rear males in colonies where their mothers have mated multiply; and why workers in singly-mated colonies kill male larvae. And there are many others.
Secondly, I have checked with the company who make the wigs for me and they are all safe and sound, here's hoping the current conflicts in Korea can be resolved safely and with no more loss of life.
Joking aside, there is only one possible conclusion. They heard Blair talk of the "scars on his back" from public sector reform, they heard him say he should have gone further and faster, and they made a decision that no matter what happened Lansley's health plans would go ahead. Just like they decided that no matter what happened, Dunky's welfare plans would go ahead. And Gove's Education reform..... and Clarke's Justice reforms..... and Gideon's money tree planting spree....
One bright afternoon, Monty and Mildred tool down the highway in his fancy car and talk about voting for Roosevelt. Monty changes the conversation to Veda, with whom he’s apparently been spending a lot of time. It’s not just me, right? This is weird, that a man in his 30’s (at least) would want to spend all this time with a kid, and Veda is a kid, she’s wearing ruffly dresses and hairbows still. Anyway, Monty thinks that Veda’s piano lessons aren’t good enough, and he recommends a new teacher for Mildred to check out. Mildred pays for his gas and tells him he’s just swell.
U.S. News & World Report speculated that Google was in town to appeal to federal policymakers, and possibly take them for joyrides in one of the company’s self-driving Prius hybrids. The outlet also noted that Google has racked up a reported $5 million legislative lobbying tab in the first quarter of 2012 alone – more contributed to candidates’ coffers in the same time period than Apple, Facebook and Microsoft combined.
Prior to leaving, Santos gives each of them a gift from his great overflowing bag of goodies. Ria get a candle that never goes out and reveals all that is hidden, Hex gets a nice magic helm, Poppy gets a skeleton key that will open any lock, Felipe gets a never melting chunk of blue ice that will reveal a pathway from one area to the next, though it is not guaranteed to be the quickest, or the safest route. Thokk gets no physical object, but instead has bestowed upon him a fearsome reputation as a kingslayer, and Sharia the Flame Princess gets a magic fire horn that strips invulnerability to fire from her enemies, and gives invulnerability to fire to her allies.
Homemade Empanadas – Cummin Chicken with Avocado on the side, the avocado took away the Spanish action and gave it a Mexican kick. Nevertheless was very tasty
The background paper fits perfectly as it has blue, green and brown tones in it so I deliberately chose sepia photos to accent the brown tones. Once I had decided on the photo layout I added some vintage themed embellishments. Finish with some journaling and you have a really nice page. Hope you like it.
I'm checking in after my first week of The Artist's Way Creativity Course.
He continues to show me words…though they’re all wrong and he seems to spend more time correcting them than anything else.
Among those on the Governor’s dinner guest list was Penny Hutchinson, director of Arts Victoria. On Lim’s itinerary was an afternoon with Parks Victoria and the Royal Botanic Gardens of Melbourne, where he was given an overview of parks and garden management.
Do you take one of these new, fresh ideas and mold it into something right away, or do you put it on the back burner and continue working on what could be book number two for your recently finished piece?
Thanks for this, Sarah! I know that a few of these are on my wishlist already, but I hadn't even heard of Darker Still and now want to read it!
The challenge this time is sponsored by The Stamping Boutique and our theme is 'Kicking Back'. We want to see all your 'relaxing' ideas. As a prize we have 3 digis and here's a bit about our sponsor,
the toughest Tom
Nigel Berry (English Democrats) 1163 (26%)
You may be wondering what all the fuss is about...
Don't forget to change your clocks tonight.
“Can you smile for me one more time?”
or under the cracking white
For instance, at Newark airport, the maximum waiting time this past March through May was routinely more than an hour, with a peak of 110 minutes from 3 to 4 p.m.
At first I didn’t know what to look for, how to value a coin, or where, when and what to buy. So I’m sure many other people are going through the same thing. Many of you may be asking your selves “where can i buy coins”. I will give some suggestions at the end of this article.
Striker in the back with WWE Champion CM Punk. He puts over his match and how he isn’t fazed by Jericho.
Lately I've been listening to the golden oldies. It makes me all smiles!
Kilometres for Communication is about promoting values of accessibility and inclusion. It’s about advocating for new policies that don’t act as barriers to people who are differently abled. It’s about hearing and sharing stories to create change. It’s about increasing services, supports and technology to help people communicate. It’s about making sure that everyone is heard. It’s about teaching people so that all of this can happen.
The dub versions showcase real tape echoes, heavy spring reverbs and alternate instrumental elements such as melodica, percussion and horns. All the dubs were mixed live in Prince Fatty’s studio in the same Rub a Dub style as was made famous in 70s Jamaica by King Tubby and others, i.e with fingers, late night vibes and re-arranged with a razor blade.
Elayna is in some kind of mental illness spiral. The crisis team has had to be called in, and her therapist actually came over. We almost had to have her hospitalized again, but with the crisis team and the fact she has a med appt tomorrow were able to keep her home. Still not sure if that was a good idea since her rages are now daily, and becoming increasingly violent. So I pray the Dr changes her meds to something that will work, because her meds now are doing ZERO.
Method: Fry well the rawa and broken vermicelli in a teaspoon of oil separately turning over thoroughly with a flat slice over moderate heat till becomes very hot to touch. and keep aside. Mix well the roasted rawa, vermicelli, curd, one tablespoon ghee, and 2 cups of cold water and keep it aside for 20 minutes. Meanwhile, heat a fry pan and pour in the remaining one teaspoon oil. When the oil becomes very hot, add in the following order: the mustard seeds to splutter, black-gram dal to lightly brown, cashew nuts, green chillies, curry leaves, and asafoetida and remove it immediately taking care not to burn any of these. Add this seasoned mixture and salt to rawa-vermicelli batter; beat up the batter well. Add a little water at this time if necessary to make a thick batter, which will drop slowly from the spoon. Make into idlees in the usual way. Serve it either hot or cold with any of your favorite chutneys. We have eaten this today with an unusual tuwar dal chutney and hot cocoa drink.
The pattern instructions come in booklet style with full color pages, photos, and great illustrations. It includes sizes 2 to 7. I did View A with the capped sleeves from View C and omitted the pocket. I made up the 4-5T size for an average weight but slightly shorter than average five and a half-year old. I did add maybe 3/4" to the length of the top/dress section. I like the snug fit on the bodice and sleeves, the length turned out good too. If I make another, I might make it just a tad longer for more of a tunic effect.
Boy! You want to talk about HATE? Just read Birth Sibling’s posts. Take a look at eldestbirthsibling’s posts as well. Have these 2 even LOOKED at the terms of use here? I happen to know halforphan56. She is a sincere lady, ( I apply the term lady to her and her alone. It has no application to the 2 previously mentioned posters.), and she’s trying to make a difference. The other 2 have been doing nothing other than meddling in her life and trying to destroy her mentally, professionally, and physically for over 30 YEARS! And why? Because halforphan56 wrote a book about her life as she lived it. Certainly there were some things that may have been unflattering about the people in her life, but anyone who has read the book knows that she was often as hard on herself as she was on others.
source: brand – Roter Hahn / Frieder Blickle
These do actually work good, if you leave off the 'good' part. The earbuds are those kind that shove down deep into your ear, probably past the safe zone recommended on the box of Q-Tips. I don't know, maybe it helps in delivering music straight to your brain. Not that it helps the sound quality at all, they're somewhere in between the 99 cent headphones from Walmart and the "they must be better because they're from Best Buy" 10 dollar ones. It kind of sounds like I'm underwater. Either that or they caused my ear drum to burst and let water into my skull.
For these reasons, we ask that the administration urge the district attorney’s office, in writing, to exercise its option not to prosecute those cases that have been forwarded in relation to the US Bank blockade, or to reverse the decision to prosecute if it has already been made. Further, we request an end to the use of retroactive legal action as a punitive measure against political protesters on our campus.
The belated Proffer is the In Bloom Green tray table, hand made in Scandinavia made out of FSC cerified birchwood (65cm) with a foldeable black metal base. Normally €325 now €260 including shipping. If you are interested drop me an email at info@mariskameijers.com. There is only one available at this Proffer price!
For this month's The Session, we are taking a trip down memory lane to a time when Miller High Life and Genesee's Golden Anniversary were acceptable beer choices. This story is from October of 2004 on a trip to visit my friend Javen in Schenectady, NY. It has some graphic medical terminology, so if you are squeamish you may want to gloss over it a bit. Hope you enjoy.
The battle for recognition is not won yet. The reputation of Canberra’s wine region is still being built. The families who develop the wines in the region are linked by their efforts and their solidarity. “In Murrumbateman we are about 15 wineries who help each other as we know that the number of wineries is what attracts people,” comments Sarah Collingwood from the Fourwinds winery.
The Israeli army has begun building a wall that will run several kilometres along part of its border with Lebanon, a military spokeswoman has said.
While I was busy making my Halloween Pops on Sunday, I thought I would take my mess to the next level and make Halloween Suckers. These suckers are super easy to make and have a big wow factor. And as an added bonus, they are made with one of my favorite ingredients - ALMOND BARK.
I should probably take my own advice, but in all honesty I just don’t want to. I have 2 beautiful boys at the moment and I’m not ready nor willing to lose the man who gave me such a beautifully perfect son; however I also know that I can’t make someone put effort into something they don’t want to.
The first time I heard of an ibis was in ninth grade. In my Honors English class, we read a short story called The Scarlet Ibis by James Hurst. It’s about a boy who has a sickly younger brother nicknamed Doodle. One day a frail bird appeared. The boys’ father identified it as a tropical scarlet ibis, apparently blown off course from a recent storm. Doodle nurses the bird, but it dies, and he carefully buries it. Despite the fact that Doodle is weak, his brother teaches him how to run, jump and climb, and wants him to do more. But he gets frustrated that Doodle isn’t progressing quickly enough. To teach him a lesson, he leaves him behind during a rainstorm. After the storm, realizing that Doodle hasn’t caught up to him, he goes back and finds Doodle dead, with blood running from his mouth.
For those of us who have been to the Rake in Borough Market, imagine that but bigger and you have it. It is a good well run bar with lots of staff for when it gets busy and also importantly knowledgeable staff that aren't afraid to say 'I don't know but bare with me whilst I ask for you'. Thumbs up for these guys. The beer is well kept and the prices are very reasonable for this part of London.
DO NOT TRUST THE CHILDPROOF AGES!!!
918 **D-XI/23/1985. “An Introduction to Plato’s Euthyphro.” Crossroads International Students Center, The University of Chicago, Chicago, Illinois. (Incorporated in Item C-1991(4), above, pp. 873-82, 1052-54.)
T: oh dude, i don't know. that sounds a little sketchy ...
And within it,
I don't keep a running tab, though maybe I should start, but I try to pay attention to most of Texas' innocence cases. Far and away, if Texas' statewide figures are any guide, drug crimes account for as many or more wrongful convictions than rapes or capital murders. Our Texas media, though, has made the same counting error identified by Liptak. The Dallas Morning News' count of exonerees since 2001 excluded exonerees from the Dallas fake drugs scandal, for example. I wrote in January that their: headlines trumpeting fifteen recent Dallas exonerations actually understate the problem. A lot more innocent people than that have seen their convictions overturned in Dallas since 2001.
I had high expectations for this Kolsch, as Mr. Lew Bryson is a fan of the brewer's former Kolsch at the Swashbuckler Brewery at the PA Renassaince Fair. I was not disappointed. It was cool, clean and collected. It proved to be a great compliment to my wrap, and was great to drink when walking in from the hot, humid weather outside.
Said, tell me the story
The term Fascism was first used by the totalitarian right-wingnationalist regime of Mussolini in Italy (1922–43), and the regimes of the Nazis in Germany and Franco in Spain were also fascist.
Still, Israel wants the world to step up the pressure on Iran. Israeli officials say the only way to prevent Iran from acquiring nuclear weapons is to impose tougher sanctions backed up by a credible military threat.
omnicidal society. Right now, I just don't know what to do...
But I was speaking with Uber-Cool Brother yesterday. If you are psychic like what I am and have a memory, like what I do not, you may remember that this year he was the recipient of two, yes, count' em, TWO, hand-knitted scarves, for his birthday.And you will already know where this story is going.
My parents also gave me a gift card to Macy's, and a really lovely birthday card. It's too long to type out here on the blog, but I will reread the card many times in the coming weeks. Just like Roll Away Your Stone, it speaks to this period of my life. Mom picked out the card herself-- she knows me really well.
The funny thing is if you were to say "so why the restlessness?" I couldn't give you a straight answer, I'll come up with something that sounds really plausible no doubt and some excuse or rationale about why it is impossible for me to correct right this instant, but in truth I can't see what it really is other than simply not accepting what a terrific life I do have and that I should stop watching it go by and live a bit more in it in the moment.
I did dogervise the power washing of the deck this past weekend and next weekend I will be dogervising putting the stain on it. (it's only taken a year Dad!!! what would he do without me pestering him the whole time?) I mean its MY deck and a boy has to have a good deck to survey his kingdom from.
"We made him an offer he couldn't refuse..." ahahahah
Ps. You'll be noticing a few changes around here in the coming weeks. I'm working hard on making the site better, and the first order of business is switching the title from how sweet it is to Leanne bakes. Now everything matches. Huzzah!
The historical pictures inside, the drawings of torture, the shackles bring tears.
Thats Been My Hood Since A Snotty Nose
We spent about three hours, wandering the place and taking pictures. As one of my classmates forgot the battery for her camera and I had the only camera that used the same battery, we actually shared the battery. A few of these shots were taken only because I was standing in the area, waiting for her to finish her shot. In the end, it all worked out. It will be interesting to see how her photos turned out, I will get to do so at the next meeting when all of our images will be publicly critiqued.
Now the headlights were another sight
One of my goals for the month of May (I’m still working on my list, but I’ll post it soon!) is to create new dress-up items for my girls each week.
As hopelessly as I—
Some art is here to remind the audience of positive past memories and to provide a comfortable space in which to re-approach them from slightly different vantages. The interest in that type of art rests on those reconfigurations being inventive enough for the familiarized audience to want to follow them for a duration, but not so derivative as to make the effort seem not worth it. At the end, this type of art is at best supplementary to the original material: it might be conducive to an enjoyable time, but the exact tool it uses to be approachable (its reference of past art forms) serves also as the main reason for it being inessential.
Additional reporting by Riffatullah Orakzai, BBC News, Peshawar
Hipsters are intriguing as a cultural study, but another sect of culture that I don’t fully comprehend. Hipsters are usually on the wealthier side of the spectrum, but they usually dress like they’re poor. Hipsters love fake horn-rimmed glasses, hats, scarves, tiny tight sweaters, layers of poor people clothing, scruff, giant bags, flannel, deep v-necks, and general homelessness-type attire that costs more than my rent. They usually segregate themselves to a certain part of town that is more “artsy” by their standards and can be conquered by their single-speed bikes (Silverlake, Los Feliz, Williamsburg, Greenwich, Wicker Park, The Design District, the entitre Northwest), filled with coffee shops and, of course, Parliament cigarettes and PBR. In my personal theory, that is mostly what they consume aside from some vegan options, thus keeping their skinny and non-muscular figures in tact. Unfortunately, they listen to most of the same music as I do, but this just means they have pretty excellent music taste. I tend to bump into these types at concerts. They flock to vintage stores, tight jeans (women’s jeans, tapered jeans, and skinnies especially), dark hair, side-swept bangs, and serious faces. Walk into American Apparel to find your inner hipster today. The tighter the better, and you might as well pick up smoking and a mustache while you’re at it.
It did later transpire that my son, whilst reading his new little chess books, decided on the crucial decider match that he would try them out. NO! Another lesson learnt. So I can now sleep easy at night knowing he did play for the win. I am a sorry individual, what can I say, but you lot already knew that. Marital harmony has now been restored.
Sat 9/27 Providence, RI Lupo's
A secret birth, an agonizing pain,
on these moments advancing the times.
About 20 of our whole group were stokers. How they ever withstood the icy temperature after the heat they were accustomed to, is extraordinary, but there was no case of illness resulting.
-Now you open your underwear drawer to find granny panties and nursing bras
And ran back out into the hallway
I am not a big fan of gore, but I can accept it when it adds to a story. Sometimes it is necessary in order to accentuate the sadism of an evil character. But here, gore is for the sake of gore. I doubt even fans of this sort of thing will go for what Untraceable puts on screen. It is not even on par with some of the laughably bad torture devices of the contemporary Saw series.
Animism is completely compatible with science, reason and logic. This is the default human spirituality, hard-wired into our brains. And it does not simply mean that one anthropomorphises every little thing, but that one understands why we must anthropomorphise things like the Mother of Nature.
On Day 20, napowrimo asked us to ‘try taking notes while you are traveling … write a poem that narrates the process of getting from Point A to Point B’.
The sentiment stamp is from a set by Lili of the Valley.
A native of South Georgia, Linda R. Herman, has been in love with the written word since she learned to read. She's been writing entertaining stories since elementary school and currently writes in many genres, most specifically Contemporary.
“Here in Britain, I want to be a comedian first and a German second. I do not want to be a comic German. I want German to be the adjective and the noun to be Comic.
This was some of the beautiful roadside views we had.
There’s no question about it, Perry was an absolute train wreck last night. FreedomWorks was actually protesting against Romney less than a month ago and now even they’re having serious doubts about the rest of the field.
I had some extra time this week to get my card finished up for the Hambo Hoedown. This week we received "CANDY HEART - digi" by Hambo Stamps. And we were challenged to either use ribbon or brads. Well, I had this great " I love you" ribbon that I wanted to use and thought this challenge was perfect for it.
as me every morning.
So I couldn't sleep, and I found this fabulous Linky Party from Erica! I just coudn't resist, but I wanted to share, in case you wanted to grab them before midnight! :)
celebrate with. It's hard to believe that May is just
New queens are being reared in mating nucleus hives as shown in today’s picture. The queens emerge as adults on day 16 after rapidly progressing through the stages of egg, larva, and pupa. After waiting five or six days in the hive in which their reproductive organs continue to develop, virgin queens make mating flights. It is important that the queens return to their own hive; they will be killed if they wander into another hive. The beekeeper can help insure the queens find their proper hive by randomly placing the hives and altering the hives’ appearance with paint color and patterns. Hives here are pointed in opposite directions to allow virgin queens to orient toward a particular mating nucleus hive. After the queens return from their mating flights, they wait another five or six days while their reproductive organs continue developing before they begin laying eggs. Feeding the mating nucleus colonies throughout the two weeks of development after the queen’s emergence is important. A strong nectar flow also helps ensure the queens receive adequate nutrition during their development.
I want to have a garage sale in the next month or two (next week would be even better) so doing a mass de-cluttering seems appropriate as well.
If there is one thing I have learned through the writing of this book, it is that taking my sticky fingers off of the controls and yielding to God is a good thing, a wonderful thing. It’s not passive, it’s hard work! And it takes practice. But though the example of m Amish friends—whose lives are embroidered with daily reminders of their dependence on God—I am learning to trust God in a more meaningful way.
To call my own, and here I am
In another blog tour stop, I was asked how you create realistic emotion, in a way that the reader feels it too. The only answer I have is that you have to be absolutely honest when you write. Readers are highly perceptive; they will catch you out if they know you are faking, just as much as your partner will. (See, too much information, I know...) But, I am a human personage. We all know what it feels like to really want someone. And so, when I needed to transfer those feelings to the piano tuner, or the window-cleaner, I had a large glass of red wine, ignored the helpful imp, and let my imagination loose.
I mention these things because one of the worst trivialisations of the word “genocide” takes place right here in South Africa, and can be seen in web sites like this one. There are people who deliberately attempt to equate “farm murders” with “genocide”. This is a kind of mischievous propaganda that is calculated to deceive, though perhaps some of those who spread it are self-deceived by their own propaganda. They are trying to create the impression that “farm murders” are all part of a deliberate plan to exterminate the “Boer race”.
THINK ABOUT ME
Or summer days, which slide one into the next,
R—Rally the troops. Attend writing workshops. Take creative writing classes. Hone your skills and get to know other writers. Keep those creative juices flowing. Many times God places writers together to write for Him. Don’t be too proud to let other writers speak into your life. Leave your ego at the door. The best stories aren’t written. They are rewritten.
A very happy Meryl Streep. Maybe not the best choice of dress according to me, but as I mentioned earlier there are worse.
I think Bill Cronin was a little surprised by how amiable I can be when I'm playing for the home team.
The call is open to all crafters world wide.
And see? The shade is perfect. If the curtain had another row of purple, it would be Behr's Sweet Petal.
A neighbor who is so unplugged that he checks his land-line phone message machine (remember those?) about once per week told me recently that he'd just finished re-reading Homer's The Iliad (in English, not ancient Greek, though he probably could have.) Others tell me of how they have technology-free days, especially for their kids. Stopping the world we know today, even if only for a few hours, allows us to hop off that painted pony and take some deep breaths in the here and now.
My brother and sister-in-law finally gave birth to their son, Jameson Donald Luellett Hula who weighed 8lbs 6oz and 22 inches.
i have not made anything new and awesome in the last week to week and a half, but i am still working on selling what i have already created.
So why on EARTH am I claiming that the mail fairy is a bitch, you ask??
After the power came back I went with my husband to get our generator serviced. I thought this was a quick mission. Nope. I sat in the truck waiting, waiting and finally stomped into the generator garage to remind my husband that I was alive. He was talking to the technician. Surprise. I was standing, tapping my toes loudly when I noticed a jar on the counter FULL of Fireballs ~ one of my favorite candies which I have not had the pleasure of sucking on in a long time! I walked right over to the counter, stuck my hand in and pulled one out. I wanted to pop it in my mouth right then but what if it was one of the wicked hot ones and I couldn't hold it in my mouth until the hotness dissolved? I didn't want this technician to see me as a wimp. So I shoved it in my coat pocket for later. Minutes go by, generator talk still droning on so to the counter I go and grab another Fireball, giggling as I pull my hand out. I looked for a sign that said 'one per customer' but none was anywhere to be seen so now two Fireballs sat in my pocket. I walked around the generator showroom trying to figure out what in the world two grown men could find so interesting about this piece of metal when the urge came over me to grab just one more Fireball. Now I am feeling a little bit naughty at this point. I know I shouldn't grab the third Fireball but I did. It was done rather sneakily but I did notice the technician watching me. Oops. Time for me to go sit in the truck. So off I went ... three brilliant red Fireballs in my pocket... which I am saving for the perfect moment when I can just sit back, eyes closed, enjoying each molecule of hotness. That was a good day.
Yet You my Lord gave everything to save a wretch like me
Her arms, they are the oak trees
And then he had a really busy day in school today. The whole year had their much-anticipated, much-practised P1 assembly, which involved each class doing a little song and mini 'scenes' detailing some of the themes they've been learning this year, for all the parents to come and watch. B's big moment was as a policeman as part of 'night and day - jobs that are done in the day and in the night'. He'd been practising his big line for a few weeks now "I am a policeman and I work at night and in the day" and he carried off with much aplomb, if I do say so myself... (hey, I don't think I've ever used aplomb in a sentence, go me!) He then got to be an owl (nocturnal animals, dontcha know), but he still had his policeman's hat on so we had an owl policeman which was very amusing... I was a very proud mummy today.
they had been watching the storm on radar
Heaven. I loved every minute of these miles. Usually I give myself until mile 6 to start my music, but I didn't need at at all. The crowds were thick. We were running through parts of Nashville that I adore, and I just wanted to soak in all of the sights and sounds. At one point, there was a 7-piece acoustic band all sitting in lawn chairs in their front yard playing for us. It just seemed so Nashville, and I was eating all of it up.
But Bill has a disability of his own: He’s a vampire with a bad reputation. He hangs with a seriously creepy crowd, all suspected of – big surprise – murder. And when one of Sookie’s coworkers is killed, she fears she’s next…
the next day was a beautiful rainy day in california.
"I need something to read," a man said to Helen.
Boomers may not be retiring as early either. The stock market crisis is partly to blame, but there are other reasons. Another issue facing this generation is that they often have to not only care for their children but their own aging parents. They have often been called the sandwich generation because of this. US News Money reported, “Almost a third (31 percent) of relatively wealthy Americans are supporting older and younger immediate family members at the same time, according to a new Merrill Lynch Wealth Management survey of 1,000 people with investable assets of $250,000 or more.” The stress from this has caused many boomers to have difficulty with their jobs and health, leading to a generation that experiences higher rates of depression.
Ellington’s hope that television would provide a significant new outlet for his type of jazz was not fulfilled. Tastes and trends had moved on without him. The introduction of the 33 1/3 rpm LP record and hi-fi phonograph though, did give new life to many of his older compositions. However by 1955, after three years of recording for Capitol, Ellington no longer had a regular recording affiliation.
Dale Doback: On Planet Bullshit!
but this is my version of a:
Next post – Plymouth, Massachusetts and then on out of New England.
to get the hell out,
What does WIP mean to you? For most crafters it's the acronym for "Work In Progress". But I came up with a list of WIP terminologies covering the whole crafting process from pre-inception to post-conclusion. Knitting is my craft and yarn my medium, so I'll focus on them, but many of these terms will apply just as well to fabrics, beads, needlepoint, DNA resequencing, polymer clays, counterfeiting. Whatever you're into.
In 2011 the property management concluded the highly anticipated construction of 10 “rustic-chic” Deluxe villas that involved a design redirection from the more traditional Balinese villas that opened the property. The clutch of new Deluxe villas offer clean and modern lines that have set a standard for an upcoming refurbishment of the original villas with a completion earmarked for Q3, 2012.
Dusting and vacuuming and tidying up
Carefully picked up the note from the desk.
Sent: Monday, March 26, 2012 4:46 PM
Which brings me to this:
Lincoln, Craig. Personal interview. 2 April, 2012. Professor of Physics at St. Louis Community College – Meramec.
"It's a beautiful method because it's so simple," said one President. "You just wait them out. You don't need policies or even a cabinet. You just need good multivitamins and regular prostate examinations.
SO, yeah, another fun thing in the month of March was The Junior League of Lincoln’s DISH It Up! event. I joined JLL two years ago and have really enjoyed it. Our annual fundraiser is the highlight of our year. We had lots of yummy food from all the best places in town!
Then, ten years ago, in a moment of madness, Ken started to write. His first article was published in Golf Illustrated in August 1996. More golf articles followed in national and regional magazines including Golf Magazine and Fairways and Greens.
Maybe your child’s uniform would be jeans and a t-shirt or button-down, or a skirt and top. Use their favorite daily style to simplify dressing and reduce costs.
Well, I can now tell you what I'm NOT going to do. I will not toss them all between two buildings to make an art installation. I cannot even begin to imagine how many chairs it would take to make a pile that size**, but what I can tell you, is that the number of bread bags tags to make a pile that size would be in the hundreds of millions if not hundreds of trillions.
She plays pretend in her kitchen
I went one step further than she did by pushing the print copy of Watched, too. I really wanted to see my books on bookstore shelves. What can I say? I love knowing thousands of my books are on people's shelves at home.
tell me again why i wasn't born independently wealthy.
Of course, you will be needing 5 tomatoes, cored (if necessary) and quartered. Also, you may use regular bell peppers, but we used 4 mini sweet peppers (We used red and yellow) And of course, 3 medium yellow onions, peeled, quartered.
Love, Love, Love it !
Northwest will host Gaithersburg on Thursday, while Seneca Valley (4-3) will visit Clarksburg.
I'm waiting to see them stretch out in their newly lit landing.
brahma-bandho kim etat
Before I get started, I wanted to announce the release of the 2005 totem....The Tiki Pirate! Look for a Tiki Head with an Eye Patch, Pirate Hat, and Hula skirt on the 10 foot pole. Find that and you'll find the Bobnoxious gang!
The only person responsible for the quality of your life is you.
Preheat oven to 350 degrees. Place flour and cranberries in food processor and process until cranberries are coarsely shredded. Put flour/cranberry mixture into mixing bowl. Add sugar to flour/cranberry mixture. Add baking powder, salt, vanilla, and butter. Mix with electric mixer until butter is no bigger than pea-size. Add milk and beat until thoroughly mixed. Add white chocolate chips and stir in with a spoon. Use an ice cream scooper to make dough balls. Pour some course sugar into a bowl and roll balls in sugar, then place on a cookie sheet lined with parchment paper. Flatten balls with the bottom of a glass until they are about ¼ inch thick. Bake for 16-17 minutes until just beginning to brown on the edge. DO NOT OVERBAKE!
And what did Jesus say: “Yet a time is coming when the true worshipers will worship the Father in spirit and truth, for they are the kind of worshipers the Father seeks. God is spirit, and his worshipers must worship in spirit and truth.” In other words, there is only one Seeker that we have to please when we worship and that is God the Father. Seeking to please anyone else is Idolatry. We have to change our thinking about what worship is, how we worship, and the One we worship. It will no longer do in our fragmented world to simply imitate the culture or, worse, worship the culture in the hopes of attracting an audience. We must be interested in the only one who is truly seeking: The Lord God Himself.
Cup to mix in
It does turn out to be very interesting for the most part. Moore and Matheos’ soundscapes are a nice test for any sound system and they force the listener to give it much more than an initial spin to detect everything that’s hidden inside this musical box. Portnoy’s abilities on the drums are actually kept fairly restrained at times on songs such as “When You’re Ready” in favor of Matheos’ nice acoustic touches, and the atmosphere that’s capped by Moore’s haunting vocals.
I've been telling my friends and family and now here.
Lulu, I actually like you even though I thought I wouldn’t. You’re a nice person to talk with and I wanted to be your friend. But you don’t need me as a friend. So thank you for being nice.
PBS Learning Media was by far the most interesting part for me since in the past I used United Streaming through Discovery Learning. When the state didn't renew its contract last September, I felt like I was left with no "go to" resource for quality science clips. Asset, through Arizona State University, has taken over where Discovery Learning left off. They now are slowly gathering all of the resources to make a tech site that will be a great tool to teachers. It's free to sign up and free to access. The site not only carries video, they also are collecting inter actives, lesson plans, audio, and image. The search makes it easy to narrow down topic, grade level, and media site. AND it allows you to set up of classroom site so that all the links that you want your students to access will be there, without having them search and find the link. They can access it at home and you can manage it so that you keep your links year round, but only allow them to access them at certain times. I'm in LOVE!
This card was in serious need of posting. I made it a while back but it's the perfect card for such amazing weather Florida has been having (sorry Non-Florida residents)
The Muslim cruelty to animals, particularly dogs, is disgusting. There are educated Muslims who would never behave in this sort of way – attacking white people, gays or torturing animals and I doubt that this behaviour is directly inspired by the Koran, yet there is a wholly unnecessary sense of fear which is felt by those who live there - not only working class people.
and you’ve just lost yours.
Hubby is fortunate to work in an industry, and for a company, that has places all over the world, as well as in many states that he could transfer to, or change companies, so we've been keeping our eye out, and praying like crazy that God will open up an opportunity for us that we are suppose to take.
5) Asian men don’t know how to have sex well... sometimes. This also depends on the man and on what you consider having sex well. I have had sex with several kind of men…(ooo…that didn’t sound good) ..but anyway…I’m experienced. I have had men that are very good, men that are ..ehhh… and men that sucked badly… and all from Asian men. I think it really boils down to experience. Most traditional men that are fairly young, have not had a lot of experience with having sex. Even older men have not studied the art of love making. They don’t have porn easily accessible and it isn’t something that is openly discussed. So, they don’t have the practice. As we all know practice makes perfect. Sex is discussed pretty openly in Western countries but in China it is still very taboo to discuss it. I even have women that are in their mid to late 20′s giggle when you mention condoms or say the word sex. So, with this kind of atmosphere on top of the nerves of having sex with a foreigner that is probably more experienced than he, it is easy to see that some Asian men can be a bit clumsy at first when they have sex. But trust me, if your patient, give them a little guidance of what you like and give them a lot of practice they will get it right and blow your mind.
One argument against outlining is that it takes the surprise out of things. I haven’t found that to be true, even with my seventeen-page whopper by my side. The characters and plot have surprised me several times, sometimes in major ways. It may be a good idea to leave some things vague, though. You can just write the Monkey Princess broke out of the castle, you don’t need to outline exactly how she blew a hole in the wall with the bomb concealed in her crown and swam across the moat. Less is more sometimes, especially if you want some explosive surprises. Just make sure you have your major plot elements down.
I remember shitting myself at school because I couldn’t go to the toilet in private; the toilet had no lock on the doors in year 3 of St James’ (or any of the toilet doors until the last few years). It was the first time I’d ever had a bowel movement outside the usual home environment, that I was aware of. It was all highly irregular, I guess, for my peers seeing someone using the toilet to defecate? A fair few children barracked the door which prevented me from doing this job properly. As I said the toilet had no lock on the door, but it
This is an actual logo designed in 1973 for the Catholic Church’s Archdiocesan Youth Commission. In fact, it won an award from the Art Directors Club of Los Angele. Did no one in the Archdiocesan Youth Commission see anything wrong with this design?
Our journey is towards the yellow river in Nibiru, the young boy saw in dream when the artificial-sun is about to take birth in Rome; letters are mere Alblackica time-ships in space zero upon the Praviculin-wavicle dance to bring us back into nature through the gyres of consciousness; Kali is Kali in the Wahali of Kali to paint the vision of the sun that lights the dark side of the earth 2088 AD onwards; there is still time to drink your coffee and read Macbeth or think about the new quantum dynamics far ahead of conventional science and reality, gather the potential for the new race and the truth in the proteins of your system as the temple of time is the place to worship where the womb is a tetra-orthogonal centre of the haploid chromosomes shining like rubies in the Altamira of the ancient tribe; beauty lasts forever in the eyes of the dance, its naked electrodes are revisiting the stars to bring energy in the carbon networks of life, the polyglossia is the fibre that has all the words upside down into the wormhole and from there as conscious flow of energy into rapidly evolving systems of differentiation; the tree sees the river thinking of the roads, and, the nights are Petrarchan sonnets dipped in albumin so the egg white and the yolk can see each other and touch, feeling as they do, to enrapt the pain with the morning-intelligence of the light, that light that falls on Claude Monet’s Le Havre is real, it’s an incarnation of the rainbow-sound in the mandala of primeval space; ‘the white feet of sound’ is actually a light of the new race by 2268 AD and then as the violets are ivy in the strange eye of the alchemists, time-travel may be the rope-trick possible in the quantum almanacs of the near future;
Wishing You Chocolaty Dreams,
The terms of Levine's project mean that she cannot go "shopping", however, a shopping "holiday" is declared when they travel out of town for her niece's graduation (why they could not stay with family is not explained) and they stay at an upscale hotel, dine out for every meal, and even stock up on clothes. Food of any sort is also expressly allowed, even when extravagant ($60 for two fish, anyone?).
Hi,hope you are having a good weekend. Sorry I haven't posted for such a long time. Life,work,hubby away skiing, just busy!
Many years ago, boycotts and sit-ins were the tools used by consumers to restrain or eliminate the bad habits of Big Business. It has been awhile since consumers exerted themselves. And it shows.
I’m so incredibly angry, in a way that isn’t mature, healthy or attractive. Angry at him, angry at her, angry at the situation, angry at myself for even being angry. Jesus, I was supposed to be over this. Now was the time for acceptance! Damn it – I was the bigger person! Why am I letting him continue to have this power over me? Why am I now, a year after everything happened, finally feeling the anger and resentment for everything he did to me – not just this?
Dancekool Studio
Add- ons:
